<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR891016-0057 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.10-16-89.f2.A1056</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="41">[FRL-3656-1]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Proposed General Demonstration NPDES Permit for Oil and Gas Operationsin Portions of the Gulf of Mexico; Fact Sheet</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>Agency: </T2>Environmental Protection Agency.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>Action: </T2>Notice of proposed general demonstration NPDES permitand request for comment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>Summary: </T2>The Regional Administrator of Region VI is proposingto issue a general demonstration NPDES permit to gather information oncertain discharges in the Offshore Subcategory of the Oil andamp; Gas ExtractionPoint Source Category. This general demonstration permit would establishBCT and BAT effluent limitations, prohibitions and other conditions ondischarges of drill cuttings from mineral oil-based muds. The permit conditionswould be based on application of thermal treatment and solvent extractiontechnologies for the treatment of cuttings from oil-based muds. The permitwould allow discharges of treated cuttings from mineral oil-based mudsfrom no more than 20 oil and gas facilities only. No more than seven (7)demonstrations of a vendor's technology would be allowed. Only facilitieslocated in certain Federal waters in the portion of the Gulf of Mexicofor which EPA Region VI administers general permit GMG280000 would be eligiblefor coverage. For wastestreams other than those associated with treatmentof drill cuttings from mineral oil-based muds, the limitations, prohibitionsand conditions set forth in general permit GMG280000 would continue toapply to facilities covered by this demonstration permit. This generaldemonstration permit would expire five years after the date of its publicationin the <T4>Federal Register </T4> as a final permit.This fact sheet sets forth the principal facts and the significant factual,legal, and policy questions considered in developing this draft permit.A copy of the draft permit is also being published today immediately followingthis fact sheet. The references cited in this fact sheet are availablefor public review at the address listed below.<ITAG tagnum="84">Public Comments</ITAG>Interested persons may submit comments on this proposed demonstration permitto EPA Region VI at the address below. The Region is seeking comments onall aspects of this proposed demonstration permit No. GMG280000, whichwould continue to be applicable to facilities covered by this general demonstrationpermit for wastestreams other than those associated with treatment of drillcuttings from mineral-oil based muds.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>Date: </T2>Comments must be received by November 30, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>Address: </T2>Comments should be sent to Region Administrator, RegionVI, U.S. Environmental Protection Agency, 1445 Ross Avenue, Dallas, Texas75202. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2> Ms. Ellen Caldwell, Permits Branch(6W-PS) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency, 1445 Ross Avenue, Dallas,Texas 75202, Telephone (214) 655-7180.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FACT SHEET AND SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background </ITAG>A. Summary of Background Information EPA Region VI is proposing to issue a general demonstration permit thatwould allow the Agency to obtain additional information concerning thermaltreatment and solvent extraction technologies for the treatment of drillcuttings from oil-based drilling fluids. These technologies are being investigatedfor possible application in national effluent limitations guidelines coveringthe oil and gas extraction category, offshore subcategory, that the Agencyis now developing. See 50 FR 34592 (August 26, 1985); 53 FR 34628 (October21, 1988). The Region has already issued two individual demonstration permitsto allow data to be gathered on the performance of one of these technologies(thermal treatment). Under those individual demonstration permits, thetechnology has been used to treat a portion of the cuttings generated duringthe drilling of three wells. The Region now has data sufficient to show that thermal treatment technologyis capable of treating cuttings to reduce their oil content so as to eliminatethe discharge of free oil. Based on this data, the Region believes thatthermal treatment technology has the potential to eliminate or substantiallyreduce the volume of cuttings from oil-based muds that must be barged toshore for disposal on land to meet the requirement of general permit GMG280000that no cuttings from oil-based muds be discharged. If the technology developsso that the volume of oil-contaminated cuttings to be disposed of on landcan be reduced or eliminated on a Gulf-wide or industry-wide basis, itcould alleviate potential adverse non-water quality environmental impactsof the current no discharge requirement. The Agency believes, however,that collection of further data is needed before this technology or similartechnologies could be used as a basis for national effluent limitationsguidelines or for any other regulatory actions covering large numbers ofoffshore facilities.  To gather data about the treatment efficiency and cost effectiveness ofcuttings treatment technologies more expeditiously than has occurred undertwo individual permits, the Region is proposing to issue this general demonstrationpermit. The Region believes that these technologies should be tested offshorebecause: (1) The Agency needs data gathered when the technologies are operatedunder the difficult circumstances in which they would most likely be employed;and (2) operating offshore under the location restrictions of this permitwill minimize any potential for environmental effect.General NPDES Permits Section 301(a) of the Clean Water Act (the Act) provides that dischargesof pollutants to waters of the U.S. are unlawful except in accordance witha National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System (NPDES) permit. Althoughsuch permits usually have been issued to individual dischargers, EPA'sregulations authorize the issuance of general permits to oil and gas facilities(40 CFR 122.28(c)(1)). As in the case of individual permits, violationof any condition of a general permit constitutes a violation of the Actand subjects the discharger to the penalties specified in section 309 ofthe Act.C. General Permits Covering Oil and Gas Operations in the Gulf of Mexicoand Limits on Discharge of Drill Cuttings From Oil-Based Muds General permits were issued on April 3, 1981 under the Offshore Subcategoryof the Oil and Gas Extraction Point Source Category (40 CFR part 435),implementing Best Practicable Control Technology currently available (BPT)to cover the then existing facilities in Region VI operating in the Gulfof Mexico including: 1. Federal waters (west of 87andmin16;, 40andmin16;andmin16;, west longitude),2. Territorial seas of the State of Texas, and 3. Territorial seas of the State of Louisiana. These permits were re-issued by Region VI through public notice in the<T4>Federal Register</T4> on September 15, 1983 (48 FR 41494, September15, 1983), and continued past their expiration date of June 30, 1984 bythe Administrative Procedure Act for current lease operators that notifiedEPA of their intent to be covered prior to June 30, 1984. Certain areasof biological concern were excluded from these general permits. The pre-1986, BPT general permits allowed the discharge of cuttings fromoil-based muds subject to a ``no discharge of free oil'' BPT effluent limitation.The permits required that the visual sheen test be used to determine compliancewith this limit. To conduct the visual sheen test, an observer looks overthe side of the facility (often some 60-80 feet over the receiving water)and records whether a sheen is observed on the surface of the water. On July 9, 1986, EPA Regions IV and VI (the Regions) issued the currentgeneral permit regulating discharges from oil and gas exploration, development,and production activities in the Gulf of Mexico seaward of the outer boundaryof the territorial seas off the States of Florida, Alabama, Mississippi,Louisiana, and Texas. 51 FR 24897 (July 9, 1986). (Unless otherwise indicated,all following references to ``the general permit'' refer to the 1986 generalpermit.) The Regions exercised Best Professional Judgment (BPJ) in determining:(1) Technology-based effluent limitations to control conventional pollutantsunder Best Conventional Technology (BCT); and 2) technology-based effluentlimitations to control toxic and nonconventional pollutants under BestAvailable Technology (BAT). The Regions also evaluated the discharges underthe Ocean Discharge Criteria (40 CFR part 125, subpart M) assuming BCTand BAT conditions were in place and set additional permit conditions.The Regions determined that the appropriate BCT effluent limitation fordrill cuttings was equal to the BPT limit of the previous permit: ``nodischarge of free oil.'' However, to implement this limit, the Regionsprohibited the discharge of cuttings from oil-based muds (rather than allowdischarge of these cuttings subject to a visual sheen test). D. Basis for EPA's BCT Prohibition on Discharge of Drill Cuttings FromOil-Based Muds Drill cuttings are mineral particles generated by drilling into subsurfacegeologic formations. Drill cuttings are carried to the surface of the wellwith the circulation of the drilling fluids and separated from the fluidsby solids separation equipment (screens, shakers, desilters, desanders)on the platform. The initial separation of drilling fluids and cuttingsis normally performed mechanically by a shale shaker. When oil-based drillingfluids are used, the solids control equipment leave substantial amountsof oily drilling fluid on the cuttings. Historically, operators had used cuttings washers to remove oil beforedischarging cuttings from oil-based muds. However, at the time the Regionswere drafting the general permit, most operators were transporting cuttingsfrom oil-based muds to shore for disposal. This practice became commonafter the Department of Interior Minerals Management Service (MMS) requiredseveral major operators to remove oily cuttings from around their facilitiesafter detection of free oil by MMS inspectors. In some cases, cuttingsfrom oil-based muds produced visual sheens weeks or months after the cuttingswere discharged even though operators had used cuttings washers. Much ofthis oil apparently was trapped in porous components of the cuttings. Thoughthe cuttings might comply with the ``no free oil'' limitation upon discharge,they released substantial amounts of oil from their location on the oceanfloor long after the original discharge occurred. Based on this evidence, the Regions determined that cuttings washers lefttoo much oil on the cuttings to satisfy the BCT limitations of the generalpermit. As the Regions did not have information indicating that other effectivecuttings treatment technologies were available, the Regions proposed theprohibition on the discharge of cuttings from oil-based muds in the draftgeneral permit. During the comment period on the draft permit, SEDSCO, Inc. (now ThermalDynamics, Inc.) commented that it had developed a thermal technology thatwould be more effective than cuttings washers in removing residual oilfrom drill cuttings. The Regions reviewed the available information anddetermined that not enough data were available on the technology to justifyits use as a basis for effluent limitations. The Regions implemented thedischarge prohibition on cuttings from oil-based muds and stated the rationalefor their decision at 51 FR 24911:<ITAG tagnum="21">In response to the comment that this limitation will not encouragethe development of cuttings treatment technology research, the Regionsacknowledge this may be the case. However, until such time as the Regionshave adequate information to demonstrate cuttings can be cleaned to achievethe no discharge of free oil limitation, the Regions do not believe theycan authorize the discharge of cuttings from oil-based muds.</ITAG>E. Individual Demonstration Permits for a Technology That Removes Oil FromCuttings From Oil-Based Drilling Fluids Soon after the general permit was issued, Thermal Dynamics, Inc. (TDI)filed petition for review of the general permit in the United States Courtof Appeals for the Fifth Circuit and requested administrative and judicialstays of the general permit's prohibition on the discharge of drill cuttingsremoved from oil-based drilling fluids. TDI argued that in view of itsnewly developed technology, the discharge prohibition was unnecessarilystringent and that the Regions were thus subjecting OCS operators to unnecessaryexpense (estimated at $5,400 per drilling day) for onshore disposal ofcuttings. Subsequently, TDI provided the Agency with new information onthe treatment efficiency of TDI's thermal recovery process; new informationon cost savings which may result from using the process instead of bargingcuttings to shore for disposal; and clarification of information submittedby SEDSCO during the comment period on the draft general permit. Afterreviewing this information, the Regions agreed to reconsider the ban onthe discharge of cuttings from oil-based muds if provided with sufficientdata on the technology's treatment efficiency. Under the terms of the general permit, it was not possible to obtain sufficientdata on the new technology's treatment efficiency and cost effectiveness.Because the general permit prohibits discharges of cuttings from oil-basedmuds regardless of treatment, there was no incentive for an OCS operatorto incur the expense of installing a treatment unit on a drilling platformso that operational data could be obtained. To address this situation,EPA Region VI issued demonstration permits DPO601 and DPO602 to ConocoInc., on March 31, 1987. See 52 FR 10262 (March 31, 1987). These permitsallowed Conoco to discharge treated cuttings from mineral-oil based mudsfrom one fixed platform and one mobile drilling rig for one year, and requiredConoco to provide EPA with specified technical data gathered in those drillingoperations and allow EPA staff to observe the treatment units in action.Under DPO601, Conoco treated a portion of the cuttings generated in drillingtwo wells. The technology was not used under permit number DPO602. On June 3, 1988, Region VI reissued demonstration permit DPO602 to allowConoco to discharge treated cuttings from one mobile drilling rig for oneyear (from July 4, 1988 to July 3, 1989). The reissued permit requiredConoco to collect more extensive data than did the previous demonstrationpermits. Region VI continued the demonstration because it concluded thatadditional data was necessary before reconsidering the general permit'sban on the discharge of cuttings from oil-based muds. The Region's decisionwas also motivated by a desire to collect additional data on a technologythat might be useful in development of effluent limitations and guidelinesfor the offshore subcategory of the oil and gas extraction point sourcecategory. See The Response to Comments on Draft NPDES Permit DPO602. F. Summary of Data Collected Under the Individual Demonstration Permitsand Other Data the Agency Has Reviewed <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Operation of the Technology </ITAG>In TDI's thermal distillation process, an auger is used to move drill cuttingsthrough electrically heated chambers where they are exposed to controlledheat sufficient to burn, distill and/or vaporize residual oils and water.The vaporized oils and water are then condensed and separated. The condensedoils may be suitable for return to the drilling fluid. The condensed wateris disposed of separately (under the individual demonstration permits,the condensed waters were discharged subject to no visual sheen test forfree oil). Reduced in volume, the treated cuttings emerge from the processas a dry clay-like material. See EPA's Notice of Data Availability (53FR 41356, October 21, 1988) for more description of this process, of threeother thermal treatment processes and of one solvent extraction methodfor treating drill cuttings that the Agency is considering in developingeffluent limitations guidelines and new source performance standards forthe offshore subcategory of the oil and gas extraction category. Under the demonstration permits, Conoco has field tested a TDI unit threetimes. The first test took place in August 1987 on Conoco's South Pass75A platform. During drilling of the A-11 well, 300 barrels of cuttingswere processed through the TDI unit. The remaining 2,899 barrels of cuttingsgenerated while drilling the well were transported to shore for disposal.Conoco conducted the second test of the TDI unit in September 1987 (SouthPass Block 75 (A-6 Well)). During this test, the unit processed 1,611 barrelsof cuttings_51% (by volume) of all drill cuttings generated (TDI 1988).The third test began in October 1988 in the Green Canyon area. From October18-25, the unit processed 354 barrels of cuttings. 184 barrels were hauledto shore for disposal. During each of these tests, operating problems ofthe kind typically associated with start-up tests on a new technology wereexperienced. None of the other thermal treatment or solvent technologies that mightbe employed under this demonstration permit has yet been demonstrated atoperational scale on an offshore facility. The Agency proposes to requirethat onshore trial runs of these technologies be performed prior to thesubmission of a request for coverage under this permit and that the applicantcertify that use of the technology will result in compliance with the limitationsof this permit (See Section IV, Specific Permit Conditions below). <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Measuring Oil Content of Raw and Treated Drill Cuttings </ITAG>Data on the oil content of raw and treated cuttings comes from three sources:TDI, Conoco and KRE, an Agency contractor. TDI utilized the Baroid retortmethod to analyze all but one of the samples it measured for oil content.As reported by TDI, the Baroid retort method indicates oil content as ``Tr,''``1%,'' 1+%,'' and so forth at low levels of oil content, and, at higheroil content levels, measures oil content to the nearest 0.5% by volume.One sample submitted by TDI was analyzed by a retort method that was reportedto measure oil content to the nearest 0.1% by weight (TDI, 1988). Conocoused a retort method that was reported to measure oil content by weightto two significant digits (e.g., 1.9%, 0.89%). Conoco also used the soxhletextraction method followed by gravimetric determination of oil content.This method measures oil content to the nearest 0.1% by weight and hasa detection limit of 0.1% oil by weight (EPA, 1979). KRE used the soxhletextraction method followed by gravimetric analysis and the retort-gravimetricmethod to analyze the oil content of cuttings samples. The Retort-gravimetricmethod provides accurate measurements of oil content down to 0.02% oilby weight (EPA, 1985). Although the retort method is the approved testfor measuring oil content of drilling fluids in the general permit (51FR 24926, July 9, 1986), the technique may not be appropriate for treatedcuttings as it is not considered to be accurate when oil content is around1% oil by weight or less. The Agency's preferred method for measuring oilcontent in drill cuttings is the retort-gravimetric method. See 53 FR 41356.Results obtained using the soxhlet extraction and retort methods have agenerally consistent relationship (retort values are about 1.23-fold largerthan soxhlet values) and the data can be roughly compared. In general,retort-gravimetric data values are lower than retort or soxhlet data values.However, there is currently not enough data to establish a consistent relationshipbetween retort-gravimetric data and soxhlet or retort data. <ITAG tagnum="81">3. Data on Oil Content of Raw and Treated Cuttings </ITAG>This discussion summarizes the data EPA has received on oil content ofraw and treated cuttings from oil-based muds. The Region's conclusionsbased on this data and a discussion of the Region's proposed regulatoryapproach for oil in treated cuttings can be found below in subpart G ofthis section and in section IV (Specific Permit Conditions). TDI reported on 26 samples of raw and treated cuttings taken during theAugust 1987 test and 19 samples from the September 1987 tests. 40 of 45samples of treated cuttings were reported to contain 1% or less oil byvolume. The highest oil content value for treated cuttings was less than3%. Raw cuttings were reported to contain 7% to 9% oil by volume (TDI,1988). TDI also submitted to EPA the results of retort analyses performedon 66 samples of raw and treated cuttings during a 1987 onshore test ofa TDI unit at Schoonebeek Holland. The oil content of raw cuttings rangedbetween 20% and 24% oil by volume. Sixty-five of the 66 samples of treatedcuttings contained 1% or less oil by volume (TDI, 1988). TDI also submittedan analysis of one sample of raw and treated cuttings from an onshore testin Alaska. The oil content of the raw cuttings was 20.3% by weight. Thetreated cuttings contained 0.4% oil by weight. TDI acknowledges that itsunits for onshore treatment of drill cuttings remove oil more effectivelythan the unit that was tested under the demonstration permits (TDI, 1988). Conoco collected and analyzed five samples of treated cuttings and twosamples of raw cuttings during the August 1987 test. The oil content oftreated cuttings ranged from 0.67% to 4.8% by weight. The arithmetic meanof the five samples was 2.9%; the standard deviation was 1.9%. One sampleof raw cuttings contained 8.3% oil by weight; the other sample was reportedto contain only 3.2% oil by weight. Conoco reported that the data (andseveral additional samples that were collected but not subjected to furtheranalysis) are not considered representative due to severe operating problemswith start-up and initial operation of the TDI unit. Conoco collected 26 samples of raw and treated cuttings during the Septembertest. All samples taken by Conoco were analyzed by the retort method. Byretort, the oil content of treated cuttings ranged from 0.05% to 4.54%by weight. The average oil content was 1.53%; the standard deviation was1.29%. The oil content of raw cuttings ranged from 3.2% to 11.9% and averaged6.97%. Fourteen of the 26 samples were analyzed by what EPA considers tobe soxhlet extraction (reported as gravimetric by Conoco). Oil contentof treated cuttings ranged from 0.15% to 3.99% by weight. The average oilcontent was 1.36% by weight; the standard deviation was 1.2%. Oil contentof raw cuttings ranged between 3.25% and 7.45% by weight and averaged 6.09%(TDI, 1988). During the September 1987 test of the TDI unit, EPA collected samples andperformed analyses for oil content and a number of other parameters. EPAhas previously described its sampling program and summarized its findingsin its Notice of Data Availability (53 FR 41356, October 21, 1988). Alsosee Kohlmann Ruggiero Engineers, P.C. (KRE), 1988. EPA tested four samples of raw cuttings and four samples of treated cuttingsfor oil content using soxhlet extraction and retort gravimetric methods.The raw cuttings contained an average of 7.11% oil by weight (soxhlet)and 5.82% oil by weight (retort-gravimetric). Using soxhlet extraction,processed cuttings contained 0.23% to 3.8% oil by weight. The average ofthe four samples was 1.4%; the standard deviation was 1.63%. By retort-gravimetricanalysis, the oil content of the same samples ranged from 0.44% to 0.86%;the average value was 0.61%; the standard deviation was 0.18% (KRE, 1988).Figure 1 below uses the EPA soxhlet and Conoco retort data from the September1987 test to show the oil content of treated cuttings over time duringthe test. The pattern of oil content of treated cuttings over time duringeach operating day suggests that some non-random factor may affect theoil content of these cuttings. In Figure 1, the oil content of treatedcuttings can be seen to rise for some period of time and then drop abruptly,as if some event has occurred. This pattern seems to recur. In no casedoes oil content drop in a series of increments, greater than analyticalmethod variability, as one would expect to see if the variation in oilcontent is random. In other words, if the oil content removal process wereentirely random then no recurring patterns would be seen.<ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-M 001</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="42">Insert illustration 3 020</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-C  </ITAG>Some evidence indicates that the oil content of drill cuttings processedby the TDI unit may depend on how often maintenance is performed. On September16th, after the oil content of the processed drill cuttings rose from 0.77%(Conoco Soxhlet) to 3.8% (EPA Soxhlet) over a period of several hours,a clogged exhaust unit was noticed. Fifteen minutes later, perhaps afterthe TDI unit was serviced, the oil content dropped to 0.44% (Conoco Soxhlet).While these data suggest that equipment maintenance is required to interrupta steady increase in the oil content of the processed drill cutting, theavailable data are not conclusive. More information on maintenance of theTDI unit during tests is needed to prove or disprove this assertion. Ifequipment servicing or some other factor such as temperature of the thermalchambers, cuttings residence time, or oil content of raw cuttings affectsthe oil content of processed drill cuttings, the Agency would need to havesufficient data to model the effect and to derive appropriate limitationsfor the technology.During the August and September 1987 tests, the oil content of the rawcuttings was considerably lower than expected for the type of mud beingused. This was probably because all of the processed drill cuttings camefrom the primary shale shaker. (The cuttings from the primary shale shakerare physically the largest cuttings in the entire cuttings recovery system.The finer cuttings from the secondary shaker, the desilter and the centrifugewould have higher oil content due to their higher surface area.) With its comments on EPA's Notice of Data Availability (53 FR 41356, October21, 1988), Conoco submitted retort data on nine samples of raw and treatedcuttings from the October 1988 Green Canyon test. Raw cuttings containbetween 5.83% and 18.65% oil by weight and contain an average of 11.08%oil by weight. Treated cuttings contain between 0.35% and 8.46% oil byweight and contain an average oil content of 3.64% by weight (Conoco, 1988).<ITAG tagnum="81">4. Data on Oil Content of Other Wastestreams </ITAG>During the second Conoco test, EPA measured the oil content of four samplesof the combined seawater/treated cuttings slurry, the condensed water,the condensed hydrocarbons and the seawater used to sluice the cuttings.All samples were analyzed by the gravimetric method for measuring oil andgrease in wastewaters (EPA Method 413.1 Oil and Grease). Both the combinedseawater/cuttings slurry and the condensed water contained an average of0.06% oil by weight (600 ppm). The condensed hydrocarbons were 97.4% oilby weight. The sample of the seawater used to sluice the cuttings containedan average of 0.003% oil by weight (32 ppm) (KRE, 1988). Based on thesefindings, EPA proposes to prohibit the discharge of condensed hydrocarbonsand to require that the oil and grease level in condensed waters be reducedto 48 mg/liter as a monthly average and 72 mg/liter as a daily maximumlimit before discharge. <ITAG tagnum="81">5. Visual Sheen Test Data </ITAG>Conoco reports that no sheens were observed when treated cuttings weredischarged during the August 1987 and September 1987 tests (Kubena, etal., 1988). The EPA and TDI studies did not address whether visual sheenobservations were made during the trial run. While the Region believesthat visual sheen observations should include more information than wasprovided by Conoco and should be recorded in log books at the time of theobservation and signed by the observer, the Region believes that it isunlikely that discharging cuttings which have been treated to the levelpossible with TDI's new technology would constitute a ``discharge of freeoil.'' One factor that supports this conclusion is the observation thatcuttings from water-based muds (about 12% of which may contain approximately1% oil by weight) have rarely, if ever, been observed to cause visual sheens.In comparison, as described above, treated cuttings from oil-based mudscontain an average of 1.4% oil by weight when measured by soxhlet extractionand 0.6% when measured by the retort-gravimetric method. In today's notice, the Agency is proposing to increase the specificityof the monitoring requirement for visual sheen observations (See sectionIV. Specific Permit Conditions below). For informational purposes, theAgency is proposing to require that treated cuttings be subjected to theminimal volume static sheen test (TRI, 1986). <ITAG tagnum="81">6. Toxicity </ITAG>The Conoco and EPA reports on the September 1987 trial run contain rawlaboratory data on the acute toxicity of untreated and treated cuttingsfrom the TDI equipment. The Conoco report also contains data on the acutetoxicity of condensed water. The acute toxicity of a material is usually measured by determining anLC<T2>50</T2>. An LC<T2>50</T2> is an estimate of the concentration of a material in an appropriatedilution water (e.g., seawater for a marine test species) that will killfifty percent of a group of organisms within a specified time period. Typically,as is the case with the toxicity test for the suspended phase of drillingfluids, the test period is ninety-six hours. High LC<T2>50</T2>s imply that a substance is non-toxic while low LC<T2>50</T2>s imply that it is toxic. Information about toxicity testingand analytical procedures used by Conoco and EPA can be found in two ofthe references supporting this fact sheet (Parrish et al., 1988 and TDI,1988). In order to make the toxicity data developed by the two laboratoriesmore directly comparable, EPA recalculated the LC<T2>50</T2> value for each test from the raw data using maximum likelihoodprobit analysis with optimization for control mortality (EPA, 1989). It appears that cuttings from oil-based muds treated by the TDI unit arenot highly toxic. Their estimated toxicity is more than one order of magnitudeless than the current limit in the general permit on discharges of water-baseddrilling muds. The two Agency samples of processed drill cuttings haveestimated LC<T2>50</T2>s of 31.7% and 40.7% (317,000 ppm and 407,000 ppm).In the industry and EPA studies, samples of the same wellmixed drill cuttingswere not tested for toxicity before and after treatment. Hence, the datado not support a direct analysis for the effect of treatment on toxicity.The average estimated LC<T2>50</T2> from the Agency's two properly conducted tests of the unprocessedsample of drill cuttings was 6.75% (67,500 ppm). The estimated LC<T2>50</T2> value for this sample is lower (more toxic) than any sampleof processed drill cuttings that was tested. However, analysis of the industrytoxicity test for one sample of untreated drill cuttings gives an estimatedLC<T2>50</T2> of 47.6% (476,000 ppm). The estimated LC<T2>50</T2> value for this sample is higher (less toxic) than any sampleof processed drill cuttings that was tested.Industry also performed a drilling fluid toxicity test on one sample ofcondensed water from the TDI unit. The condensed water had relatively lowtoxicity (the LC<T2>50</T2> from this test was 53.9% (539,000 ppm)).<ITAG tagnum="81">7. RCRA Components</ITAG>EPA performed RCRA components tests on both raw and processed cuttings.Neither material ignited below 200 anddegrees;F and both are considered noncorrosiveunder the EPA standard at 40 CFR 261.22. Both materials proved nonreactivein tests for cyanide and sulphates. pH measurements of the condensed waterand treated cuttings/seawater slurry ranged from 7.5 to 8.5. The averagepH of the condensed water was 8.1; the average pH of the treated cuttings/seawatermixture was 8.3. Based on these findings, neither the raw nor the treatedcuttings fail the EPA tests for hazardous wastes. <ITAG tagnum="81">8. Priority Pollutants and Other Toxic Pollutants </ITAG>Conoco tested raw cuttings, processed cuttings, condensed hydrocarbonsand condensed water for the presence of the 88 priority organic compounds.Conoco reports that no priority organics were detected in raw or treatedcuttings. Conoco did detect priority organics in the condensed wastestreams.The condensed hydrocarbons contained toluene (45 mg/kg); ethyl benzene(35 mg/kg) and benzene (25 mg/kg). The condensed water contained semivolatilephenol (10,000 ug/kg or 10 mg/kg); benzene (110 ug/kg); toluene (81 ug/kg);chloromethane (16 ug/kg); ethyl benzene (11 ug/kg) and chlorobenzene (5.4ug/kg). The exact volume of these waste streams was not reported, but Conoconotes that the volume of the condensed water generated was ``very small''(Kubena et al., 1988). EPA tested a total of ten samples for 234 organic compounds_one sampleof raw cuttings, four of processed cuttings, one of condensed hydrocarbonand four of condensed water. The Agency detected six of the compounds inthe raw cuttings and 18 of the compounds in the treated cuttings. In theraw cuttings, priority organics were not detected. In processed cuttings,the Agency detected: Naphthalene (4595 ug/kg); toluene (64 to 496 ug/kg);benzene (57 to 116 ug/kg); and ethyl benzene (14 ug/kg). EPA's data onorganic compounds in the condensed hydrocarbons and condensed water weresimilar to the Conoco findings. <ITAG tagnum="81">9. Biological Oxygen Demand (BOD) </ITAG>Conoco collected BOD data which show average BOD values of 1,890 mg/kgfor raw cuttings and 1,650 mg/kg for treated cuttings. The Agency believesthat these levels of BOD would not unreasonably degrade the marine environment.<ITAG tagnum="81">10. Solids Content </ITAG>The Agency tested the treated cuttings/seawater slurry, the condensed waterand the receiving water for TSS and found that, on average, slurried cuttingscontained 12.4% TSS (12,365 mg/l); condensed water contained 79.5 mg/lTSS; and the receiving water contained 24 mg/l TSS. The Agency believesthat these levels of solids will not unreasonably degrade the marine environment.<ITAG tagnum="81">11. Air Emissions </ITAG>Conoco tested the TDI unit's air emissions. Particulate matter emissions(3 samples) averaged 0.0113 mg/m\3\. Eight measurements for organics indicatedthat, on average, the off-gas contained 39.33 mg/m\3\ of benzene and 17.52mg/m\3\ of toluene. Total hydrocarbon emissions were 9.158 mg/m\3\. Theaverage of three samples tested for SO<T2>X</T2> and NO<T2>X</T2> was less than 1 mg/m\3\ of each pollutant. Average CO concentrationwas 621 mg/m\3\ (four samples tested). EPA did not take air samples dueto unavailability of air sampling personnel during the Agency's samplingeffort.Air emissions from OCS oil and gas facilities are regulated by the MMS.Currently, the only parameter that MMS limits is total yearly hydrocarbonemissions. The current limit is 33.3 tons per year of hydrocarbon emissionstimes the distance of the facility to shore in statute miles. EPA has submitteddata on air emissions from the TDI unit to the MMS for its considerationand will closely consult with the MMS about air emissions from this orother cuttings treatment technologies. Agency concerns about emissionsof ozone-damaging compounds from the solvent extraction process for treatingdrill cuttings are discussed in the Notice of Data Availability (53 FR41356, October 21, 1988).<ITAG tagnum="81">12. Costs </ITAG>EPA recently requested comments on cost information the Agency had developedon the TDI technology, one other thermal treatment technology and a solventextraction method for reducing the oil content of drill cuttings (See 53FR 41356, October 21, 1988). The Agency estimates that, after adjustmentfor the value of oil recovered, the TDI unit would cost $70 per barrelof cuttings treated. A second thermal distillation process would cost $36per barrel of cuttings treated (only a prototype ``demonstrator'' modelof this unit has been tested on drill cuttings). EPA estimates that thesolvent extraction method would cost $75 per barrel of cuttings treatedafter adjustment for the value of the oil recovered. In comparison, EPAestimates that onshore disposal of drill cuttings would cost about $46per barrel. For the September 1987 test of the TDI unit, Conoco reports spending $127,460to rent the TDI unit and an additional $60,000 to modify the drilling platformfor its installation. It thus cost Conoco about $116 to treat each barrelof raw cuttings (1,611 barrels) treated under the demonstration permit.By contrast, Conoco has said it paid $62,000 or slightly over $40 per barrelfor transportation and onshore disposal of untreated cuttings generatedin the same drilling operation. The Agency does not believe that this costcomparison is definitive because, as cuttings treatment technologies arecurrently under development, the cost of using these technologies may drop.In addition, in a limited demonstration such as the September 1987 test,the volume of cuttings treated is so low as to magnify the effect of fixedcosts that were incurred. <ITAG tagnum="81">13. Non-water Quality Environmental Impacts </ITAG>Air emissions and energy consumption are two potential non-water qualityenvironmental impacts of treating cuttings from oil-based muds. Air emissionswere discussed in Item 11 above. While the Agency has limited informationabout the energy consumption of cuttings treatment technologies, the Agencyhas no evidence that these technologies consume significant amounts ofenergy. EPA will request that additional information about the energy consumptionof cuttings treatment technologies be provided by operators under thisdemonstration permit. To the extent that offshore-generated cuttings contributeto environmental problems associated with land disposal of oil and gaswastes onshore, issuing this general demonstration permit may have a positiveeffect by decreasing the volume of cuttings that is barged to shore fordisposal. <ITAG tagnum="81">14. Safety </ITAG>The Agency has been presented with information about flash fires that occurredduring operation of the TDI unit under the individual demonstration permits(Conoco, 1989). The Agency has also been presented with information aboutthe potential for accidents in rough seas that could endanger workers involvedin the transportation of cuttings to shore for disposal (API, 1989). Currently, occupational safety and health at OCS oil and gas facilitiesis regulated by the MMS and the U.S. Coast Guard. EPA has submitted alldata it has received on safety issues to the MMS and the Coast Guard fortheir review. EPA will consult closely with these agencies on all actionsEPA takes that may affect occupational safety and health on OCS oil andgas facilities. G. The Region's Conclusions Based on Available Data During the individual demonstration permit program, one vendor of a cuttingsoil content reduction technology has demonstrated the ability to set upand run its technology on an offshore development facility. The technologyhas been shown, when operating properly, to be able to reduce the oil contentof drill cuttings, separated from an oil-based mud at the primary shaleshaker, to less than 1% by weight (as measured by retort-gravimetric analysis).The processed cuttings were dry and granular in appearance. The resultsindicate that the thermal distillation unit tested could achieve a significantreduction in the oil content of drill cuttings. Although the treatmentefficiency of the process is still under investigation, it is apparentlymuch more effective than cuttings washers. The Region believes that itis unlikely that discharging cuttings which have been treated to the levelpossible with TDI's new technology would result in a ``discharge of freeoil.'' Levels of other pollutants and pollutant parameters in the treatedcuttings (toxicity, BOD, TSS) are lower than or similar to levels of thesepollutants in water-based muds and cuttings which are currently dischargedunder the general permit. Despite issuing two individual demonstration permits to gather data onthermal distillation technology and despite a number of generally favorablefindings, the Region has determined that it has not received enough informationto conclude that the technology is an appropriate basis for setting effluentlimitations and conditions in the general permit or as a basis for nationalguidelines. One factor is that the technology has not been demonstratedto be cost-effective when compared to transport to shore and land disposal,the current BCT basis for meeting the ``no discharge of free oil'' requirementin the general permit. Operating problems of the kind typically associatedwith start-up tests on a new technology have kept the TDI unit from processingcuttings at a rate that could treat all cuttings generated during normaldrilling operations. At currently demonstrated processing rates, usersof the technology would still incur the fixed costs associated with bargingcuttings to shore for disposal. The cost-effectiveness of this technologyor similar technologies may improve and considerations other than costmight have great weight in an operator's decision to employ a particulartechnology. However, to conclude that onshore disposal was an inappropriatetechnology basis for the BCT-level controls on free oil in the generalpermit, the Region would need more evidence that the costs of an alternativeBCT technology appear to be roughly in line with the cost estimates foronshore disposal. The Region is also concerned about the variation in oil content of cuttingstreated by the TDI unit. The available data show that treated cuttingsmay sometimes contain more than 4% oil (as measured by soxhlet extractionand retort methods), a level that Region is not convinced will ensure compliancewith the visual sheen test for free oil. The available data suggest thatvariation in oil content is not entirely random and that a factor suchas time since maintenance was performed may contribute significantly tothe variation in oil content. However, there is not enough data at thistime to conclude that equipment servicing or other factors such as oilcontent of the raw cuttings, kiln temperature or cuttings residence timeis a substantial cause of the variation. If operation of cuttings treatmenttechnologies under this demonstration permit indicates that variation inoil content is dependent on a factor such as a maintenance, the Regionmay determine that it would be appropriate to set a permit condition suchas a maximum operating time before equipment is serviced if the Regionwere to propose to modify the Gulf-wide general permit. H. Decision To Propose a General Demonstration Permit Rather Than IndividualDemonstration Permits and Discussion of the Scope of the Proposed PermitBecause of the Region's difficulty in gathering sufficient data on theeffectiveness of cuttings oil content reduction technologies in a timelyfashion, the Region has decided to propose to issue a five-year generaldemonstration permit. The Region believes that the potentially larger numberof facilities participating in the demonstration will facilitate the generationof necessary data. By opening up the proposed demonstration to other vendorsof cuttings treatment technologies and other operators of offshore oiland gas facilities, the Region is not favoring one technology or operatorover others. The Region believes that these technologies should be demonstrated offshorerather than on land or in near-shore waters for a number of reasons. Thesetechnologies are primarily intended for operation on offshore rigs wherethe discharge of cuttings from oil-based muds is prohibited. To properlyevaluate the treatment efficiency of the technologies, it is necessaryto operate them under the difficult conditions (primarily the space limitations)imposed by drilling on platforms and mobile rigs. As these technologiesare not yet fully demonstrated, the Agency believes it is prudent to operatethem in deep, far-offshore waters so that any potential environmental effectscan be minimized. Also, the demonstrations that have occurred to date andother information the Agency has received indicate that, in near-shorewaters, these technologies may be more expensive than onshore disposalof drill cuttings. It is possible that these technologies will be cost-effectiveonly in far-offshore waters where barging costs are higher than average.As the purpose of this proposed permit is to gather data, the Region believesthat no more than 20 facilities should participate in this demonstrationand that no more than seven demonstrations of any one vendor's technologyshould be allowed. A demonstration of this magnitude should supply theAgency with sufficient data to conclude whether cuttings treatment technologiesmay be an appropriate basis for BAT effluent limitations for drill cuttings.Only discharges of cuttings from mineral-oil based muds would be authorizedunder this permit. As the technologies that would be operated under thispermit are not yet fully demonstrated, the Region believes that it wouldbe inappropriate to permit the discharge of cuttings from more toxic dieseloil-based muds. Based on the Agency's experience with individual permits DP0601 and DP0602,the Region has concluded that a five-year term is appropriate for thisgeneral demonstration permit. The Region believes that a shorter permitterm would not allow for further technology development where needed; agreementsto be reached between technology vendors and offshore operators; and actualinstallation and operation of the technologies. <ITAG tagnum="85">II. Nature of Discharges From Cuttings Oil Content Reduction Technologies</ITAG>After thermal treatment, processed cuttings from oil-based muds are inthe form of a granular material. The material is cooled and slurried bymixing with seawater and then discharged to the ocean. The water and hydrocarbonvapors driven from the wastes are condensed and then separated in an oil/waterseparator. The hydrocarbons recovered can potentially be recycled and reusedin the active mud system, subject to meeting the specifications for oiladditives to the mud. Alternatives to recycling the recovered hydrocarbonswould be to dispose of them separately or to market them for other purposes(e.g., heating fuel). If the recovered water meets effluent limitations,it could be suitable for discharge. If the recovered water does not meetthese effluent limitations it may be necessary to treat the recovered water.If there are no oil/water separation facilities at the site the recoveredwater may need to be transported to another facility for adequate treatmentor handling. Exhaust gases from the heating chambers in the thermal distillationunit and from the condenser would be treated to achieve appropriate airemissions standards. Similar wastestreams would be discharged after treatmentof cuttings by a solvent method for oil extraction. <ITAG tagnum="84">III. Statutory Basis for Permit Conditions </ITAG>A. BCT and BAT Limitations The proposed demonstration permit would change the regulatory requirementsapplicable to participating facilities as follows: It would allow the dischargeof cuttings from mineral oil-based muds by participating facilities subjectto (1) a by-weight limitation on ``oil content'' of treated cuttings; (2)a toxicity limit; and (3) a ``no discharge of free oil'' limit as measuredby the visual sheen test or, at times when a visual observation of sheenis not possible, by a static sheen test. There would also be a limitationon the oil and grease levels in condensed waters that are discharged anda prohibition on the discharge of condensed hydrocarbons. In all otherrespects, the provisions in the Gulf-wide general permit would continueto apply.\1\<NOTE/> <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ In <T3>NRDC. </T3>v. <T3>EPA,</T3> 863 F.2nd 1420 (9th Cir. 1988), the Court invalidated theprovisions of the Gulf-wide general permit relating to ``alternate toxicitylimits.'' The references to the provisions of the Gulf-wide general permitin this fact sheet and in the proposed permit do not refer to those invalidatedby the Court. The Gulf-wide permit prohibits the discharge of ``cuttings from oil basedmuds'' as a BCT limitation. 51 FR 24,898, col. 3 (July 9, 1986) (preamble);51 FR 24,921, col. 2 (permit) [``(a) Cuttings From Oil Based Drilling FluidsDischarge Prohibition. The discharge of cuttings, produced when using oil-basedor inverse emulsion drilling fluids, is prohibited.''] In addition, thepermit prohibits the ``discharge of free oil from discharges authorizedby this permit, with the exception of produced water discharges * * *''51 FR 24,899, col. 1 (preamble). The explanation for the BCT discharge prohibition on oil contaminated drillcuttings was as follows: ``The final permit prohibits the discharge ofcuttings associated with oil-based muds. The Regions determined that thedischarge of such cuttings would violate the BPT ``no discharge of freeoil'' limitation (see response to Comment 10).'' 51 FR 24,899, col. 1.The response to Comment 10 elaborated: ``Because of * * * past permit violations,the Regions have determined to prohibit the discharge of cuttings associatedwith oil based muds. The Regions do not have sufficient information atthis time to demonstrate that current cuttings washers technologies canconsistently reduce the oil content of cuttings below 10 percent (Jonesand Burgbacher 1983). The Regions do not believe this is sufficient tocomply with the BPT ``no discharge of free oil'' limitation * * * [U]ntilthe Regions have adequate information to demonstrate cuttings can be cleanedto achieve the no discharge of free oil limitation, the Regions do notbelieve they can authorize the discharge of cuttings from oil based muds.''51 FR 24,911, col. 2. Thus, the Regions' reason for imposing the prohibition on discharge wasthat they had insufficient data to conclude that discharges of cuttingstreated with cuttings washers would not violate the ``no free oil'' limitation.The Regions left open the possibility of revision of the BCT prohibitionon the discharge of cuttings from oil-based muds after receipt of datashowing that the cuttings could be treated so as not to release ``freeoil.'' (General permits issued by EPA Region X already allow the dischargeof cuttings from oil-based muds, but impose a 10% limitation on oil content,a static sheen test to additionally limit the discharge of ``free oil,''and toxicity limitations and other limits addressing the regulatory concernsassociated with the discharge of cuttings from oil-based muds.) Region VI now has data sufficient to show that the thermal distillationtechnology is capable of treating cuttings to reduce the oil content toless than 1% by weight so that the ``no free oil'' standard can be met.The data are not sufficient, however, to support Gulf-wide modification,principally because doubts remain concerning the reliability of the technologyand its ability to consistently treat the necessary volume of cuttings.Moreover, the thermal distillation technology has the potential to eliminateor substantially reduce the volume of oil-contaminated cuttings that mustbe barged to shore for disposal on land. If the technology develops sothat the volume of cuttings to be disposed of on land can be reduced oreliminated on a Gulf-wide or industry-wide basis, it could alleviate potentialadverse non-water quality environmental impacts of barging to meet thecurrent no discharge requirement. Region VI has already issued two individual demonstration permits thatallow the discharge of cuttings from oil-based muds in order to gatherdata that would allow full evaluation of the capabilities and environmentaleffects of the use of thermal distillation on cuttings from oil-based muds( one individual demonstration permit expired July 3, 1989). The U.S. Courtof Appeals for the Ninth Circuit referred to these permits with approvalin <T3>NRDC </T3>v. <T3>EPA, </T3>863 F.2nd 1420, 1433 (9th Cir. 1988). This proposal wouldexpand the demonstration program to cover 20 additional facilities, butit also would include stringent additional controls (e.g., oil contentand toxicity limitations) and enhance the usefulness of resulting databy expanding the monitoring requirements. As ``oil content'' is a nonconventional pollutant, it is being subjectedto BAT level control. In addition, as EPA stated in a recent notice ofdata availability concerning the development of effluent limitations guidelinesfor the offshore subcategory, ``oil content'' is an indicator pollutantto control the discharge of priority and nonconventional organic pollutantspresent in the hydrocarbons that are added to drilling fluids and in thehydrocarbons from formation fluids that are entrained in the drilling fluid.These same priority and nonconventional pollutants are present in the drillcuttings wastestream and may be similarly controlled by an oil contentlimitation. 53 FR 41,374 (October 21, 1988). As noted in Part I.F.8 of this notice, EPA found that thermally treateddrill cuttings do contain detectable levels of priority organic pollutants.The Region believes that the regulatory approach described in section IV(Specific Permit Conditions) would appropriately control these prioritypollutants and other toxic pollutants. The Region believes that settingspecific BAT limitations for these individual toxic pollutants is not feasible.The Region finds that thermal distillation is the best available technologyto treat oil content in cuttings from oil-based muds. Available cost datashow that it is economically achievable. The reduction of waste to be disposedof on land (a non-water quality environmental impact) is an important considerationin the Agency's determination of BAT for this proposed permit. EPA willuse the data generated by any participating facilities to determine appropriateBAT-level controls for drill cuttings in the national effluent guidelinesrulemaking and to consider modifying the Gulf-wide general permit. As the data currently available are not sufficient for developing a BATtoxicity limitation specific to treated cuttings, the Region is proposingto set a toxicity limit based on the general permit's BAT toxicity limitationfor drilling fluids. Setting such a limit would ensure that dischargesof treated drill cuttings contain no more toxicity than discharges of drillingfluids authorized by the general permit. Condensed or otherwise separated water will be treated in the same manneras produced waters are regulated in the general permit: they will be subjectedto a BCT limitation on oil and grease content. The discharge of condensedor otherwise separated hydrocarbons will be prohibited so as to meet a``no discharge of free oil'' BCT limitation. B. Ocean Discharge Criteria Section 403 of the Act requires that an NPDES permit for a discharge intomarine waters located seaward of the inner boundary of the territorialseas be issued in accordance with guidelines for determining the degradationof the marine environment. Section 403 and these guidelines, referred toas the Ocean Discharge Criteria (40 CFR part 125, subpart M), are intendedto ``prevent unreasonable degradation of the marine environment and toauthorize imposition of effluent limitations, including a prohibition ofdischarge, if necessary, to ensure this goal'' (45 FR 65942, October 3,1980). An exhaustive Ocean Discharge Criteria Evaluation (ODCE) was completedfor all discharges from oil and gas facilities in the area covered by thisdemonstration permit before the current Gulf-wide general permit was issued.The ODCE found that, when discharged in compliance with the limitationsin the Gulf-wide general permit, the effects of drilling muds, cuttingsand produced waters would not be measurable beyond a distance varying frommeters to hundreds of meters for chemical effects on benthic sedimentsor biological effects on benthic communities. The ODCE found that the effectsdue to the suspended solids loads of these discharges would not be measurablebeyond a distance varying from hundreds of meters to a few thousand meters.The effect on biological populations in the water column is virtually negligible.Regarding all other criteria that make up the ODCE, the Region found thatthe effects of discharges from oil and gas facilities, singly, are localand ephemeral and do not constitute unreasonable degradation of the marineenvironment. The Regional Administrator has concluded that oil and gas facilities operatingunder the effluent limitations, conditions and prohibitions in this proposedgeneral demonstration permit would not cause unreasonable degradation ofthe marine environment pursuant to the Ocean Discharge Criteria guidelines.One basis for this determination is that the mineral oil content of treatedcuttings is expected to be less than the mineral oil content of water-basedmuds to which oil has been added and cuttings from muds that are currentlyauthorized to be discharged under the general permit. BOD, TSS and toxicitylevels in the treated cuttings are similar to or lower than the levelsof these parameters in materials that are currently authorized to be discharged.The volume of material discharged under this permit would be extremelysmall compared to currently permitted discharges under the general permit.Finally, cuttings are discharged as they are produced. Therefore, bulkdischarges comparable to end-of-well drilling fluid tank discharges arenot anticipated. Continuous discharge at a low rate during drilling operationswould yield excellent dispersion and further reduce any adverse environmentaleffect. C. Section 308 of the Clean Water Act Under section 308 of the Act and 40 CFR 122.44(i) the Administrator mustrequire a discharger to conduct monitoring to determine compliance witheffluent limitations and to assist in the development of effluent limitations.EPA has proposed extensive monitoring requirements in this general demonstrationpermit, as described in section IV Specific Permit Conditions below. <ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Specific Permit Conditions </ITAG>A. Approach The determination of appropriate conditions for discharges associated withoperation of cuttings oil content reduction technologies was accomplishedthrough: (1) Consideration of technology-based effluent limitations tocontrol conventional pollutants under Best Conventional Technology (BCT);(2) consideration of technology-based effluent limitations to control toxicand nonconventional pollutants under Best Available Technology (BAT); and(3) evaluation of Ocean Discharge Criteria and other legal requirements(e.g., consistency with Coastal Zone Management Plans), assuming BCT andBAT conditions were in place. As this proposed demonstration permit is intended to gather data for usein future regulation of drill cuttings wastestreams, the Region has proposedthat extensive information be submitted with requests for coverage andhas proposed limits on the number of facilities eligible for coverage andon the number of demonstrations involving any one vendor's technologies.Discussions of the proposed eligibility and application requirements andspecific proposed effluent limitations and monitoring requirements appearbelow. B. Eligibility for Coverage Under This Permit Only 20 oil and gas facilities covered by the general permit would be eligiblefor coverage under this proposed permit. In addition, no more than seven(7) demonstrations of any one vendor's technology would be authorized.The Region believes that a demonstration on this scale is sufficient toprovide the data needed to resolve remaining questions about the efficiencyof cuttings oil content reduction technologies. As described under F. below,only facilities located in certain geographic areas would be eligible forcoverage. Only discharges of treated cuttings from mineral-oil based muds would beauthorized under this permit. As the technologies that would be operatedunder this permit are not yet fully demonstrated, the Agency believes thatit would be inappropriate to allow the discharge of cuttings from moretoxic diesel oil-based muds. C. Requests for Coverage The Region is proposing that a written request for coverage by the generaldemonstration permit be provided as described in part II. C. of the proposedpermit at least 60 days prior to the proposed date of initiation of dischargesof treated cuttings and condensed waters at the site. The request for coveragewould identify the legal name and address of the operator, identify thelocation of the proposed demonstration and provide information on conditionsat the site that might, under the terms of the proposed permit, prohibitdischarge at the intended demonstration site. It is proposed that the requestfor coverage be accompanied by a signed and dated certification by theapplicant that: (1) The applicant has carefully reviewed the permit andunderstands its limitations, terms and conditions; (2) the location ofthe proposed discharge complies with the location restrictions imposedby the permit; (3) an onshore trial run of the cuttings treatment technologymeeting the requirements of part II.C.2 of this permit has been completed;(4) the applicant has mailed to EPA all of the information required fordocumenting the design and performance of the cuttings treatment technologyto be employed (<T3>See</T3> part II.C.2 of the permit); and (5) based on the applicant'scareful evaluation of the data generated during the onshore trial run,the technology that will be demonstrated will meet the limitations of thepermit. Applicants would also be required to submit the following support informationto the Director, Industrial Technology Division (WH-552), U.S. EPA, 401M St. SW., Washington, DC: (1) A description of how the cuttings treatment technology operates; (2) The stated treatment capacity of the equipment; (3) Data from an onshore trial run of the equipment to be operated underthe permit showing the amount of each of the various wastestreams generated(including air emissions) and the amount of cuttings treated; (4) Data from the trial run on the oil content of the raw and treated cuttingsas measured by retort-gravimetric analysis (Proposed Method 1651, 53 FR41356, October 21, 1988); (5) Trial run data on the oil content of any liquid wastestreams (e.g.,condensed hydrocarbons and condensed water) as measured by the gravimetricmethod (EPA Method 413.1 Oil and Grease); (6) Results of static sheen tests (as a visual sheen test will not be possibleunder a trial run) conducted under the protocol described in Appendix Bto the attached proposed permit; (7) Data from the trial run on the toxicity of the raw and treated cuttingsand any other wastestream proposed to be discharged (e.g., condensed waters)(the required toxicity test methods are described in the attached draftpermit); (8) Data from the trial run on the levels of TSS, BOD and priority pollutantsin wastestreams that are proposed to be discharged and from the ResourceConservation and Recovery Act (RCRA) tests for characteristic hazardouswastes; (9) Data from the trial run on the levels of total particulates, totalhydrocarbons, SO<T2>X</T2>, NO<T2>X</T2> and CO in air emissions; (10) Information on space requirements and weight of the equipment; (11) Information on energy requirements; (12) An operating and maintenance log indicating all hours of operationduring the trial, what maintenance was performed and when it was performed;and (13) An estimate of the cost per barrel of cuttings treated if the equipmentwas operated under this permit, accompanied by a description of all assumptionsand information used in developing the estimate. The Region will decide whether to grant the request on the basis of therequest for coverage and on the certification which is to accompany therequest for coverage. D. BCT Requirements The Region has determined that the appropriate BCT limit for dischargeof treated cuttings is a requirement that no free oil be discharged, asmeasured by the visual sheen test. The Region also proposes to apply theBCT findings for produced waters in the general permit and require thatthe oil and grease levels in any condensed or otherwise separated watersthat are discharged meet the general permit BCT limit for produced waters:72 mg/liter as a daily maximum and 48 mg/liter as a monthly average. TheAgency believes that this approach is appropriate as: (1) The physicaland chemical characteristics of the two wastestreams are similar and (2)The technologies available for treating produced waters can be appliedwithout modification to the waters that may be separated during treatmentof drill cuttings. The discharge of hydrocarbons removed from the cuttings during treatmentwould be prohibited in order to ensure compliance with the existing ``nodischarge of free oil'' limitation. E. BAT Requirements The Region is proposing to set a BAT level oil content limit on treatedcuttings based on the four samples of treated cuttings the Agency collectedin September 1987 under demonstration permit DP0601. The September 1987test was the longest and most successful of the offshore demonstrationsto date and most closely indicates the treatment efficiency the technologycan achieve. In addition, these data are the only data measured by theAgency's preferred method for measuring oil content of drill cuttings.As the oil content of these four samples (when viewed in terms of soxhletextraction and gravimetric analysis) is similar to the oil content foundin Conoco's larger set of samples collected during the test, using onlythese four points rather than Conoco's larger set of data should not appreciablyaffect the proposed oil content limit. While there is some evidence that the oil content of treated drill cuttingsfrom the technology tested under the demonstration permits is dependenton maintenance or some other factor, until more data are available theRegion is proposing to set an oil content limit assuming that variationin oil content is random. Using the data described above and the Agency'slong established procedures for setting effluent guideline limitationsand numerical permit limits, the proposed daily maximum limit on the oilcontent of treated drill cuttings is 1.16% by weight. Assuming ten samplesof treated cuttings are analyzed for oil content per month, the proposedmonthly average limit on the oil content of treated cuttings is 0.71% byweight. Compliance must be measured before the treated cuttings are mixedwith seawater (for sluicing cuttings to the discharge point). The Region believes that limiting the oil content of treated cuttings isappropriate because the one technology that has been tested in the Gulfof Mexico has shown the capacity to both provide excellent treatment andalso to leave levels of oil in treated cuttings that might cause violationsof the existing ``no discharge of free oil'' requirement. Setting a limiton the oil content of treated cuttings would ensure that technologies areoperated in a manner that minimizes the possibility that discharge of treatedcuttings would result in a discharge of free oil. Because the data currently available on the toxicity of treated drill cuttingsis not sufficient for setting a limitation, the Region is proposing a BATtoxicity limit on treated cuttings based on the toxicity limit in the generalpermit for discharged drilling fluids (LC<T2>50</T2> of discharged material must be 30,000 ppm or greater). F. Requirements Based on the Ocean Discharge Criteria Evaluation and OtherLegal Requirements The general permit prohibits discharge in areas of biological concern (ABCs)and sets a drilling fluids discharge rate limitation within 544 metersof these areas in order to protect them from unreasonable degradation.While it appears that treated cuttings from oil-based muds have low toxicity,as the purpose of this permit is to gather information on technologiesthat have not yet been fully demonstrated, the Region is proposing to approverequests for coverage only from operators of facilities that are locatedmore than 544 meters from ABCs. As an additional precaution, the Regionis proposing to approve requests for coverage only from operators of facilitiesthat are also located in waters more than 20 meters deep. This measurewould help to ensure good dilution and dispersion of the discharged wastestreamsfrom cuttings treatment. To allay any concern that discharges authorized by this permit would affectstate coastal zones or result in violation of state water quality standardsthat apply in the territorial seas, the Region is proposing not to approverequests for coverage from operators of facilities located within 1000meters of state waters as defined in the Clean Water Act. G. Monitoring Requirements In addition to the requirements described above, the Region is proposingto require operators under this permit to: (1) Keep a detailed drill cuttings treatment equipment operations log;(2) Monitor raw cuttings feed rate, temperature of thermal chambers (ifapplicable) and residence time of the cuttings in the treatment unit; (3) Frequently monitor the oil content of raw and treated cuttings; (4) Perform visual and static sheen tests; (5) Perform toxicity tests on treated cuttings and condensed waters; (6) Monitor the organic pollutant and metals content of treated cuttings;(7) Document the labor required to operate the technology; (8) Monitor the volume of any condensed hydrocarbons and condensed watersproduced and note the disposition of these wastestreams; (9) Measure the oil content of any condensed waters; (10) Document the normal rate of use of water used to sluice treated cuttings;(11) Measure the rate of electric power and fuel consumption of the cuttingstreatment equipment; and (12) Document the chemical and trade name of any solvents or other chemicalsused in the treatment process.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">EPA intends to use the information it receives in future regulationof discharges of cuttings from oil-based muds. For tests of the toxicity of raw and treated drill cuttings,  this demonstrationpermit proposes two changes to the drilling fluids toxicity test samplepreparation procedures that the Agency proposed on August 26, 1985 (50FR 34631, August 26,1985). These changes are specified in part III.C.2of the attached draft demonstration permit. The change in the procedurefor mixing the 1-part drill cuttings: 9-part seawater mixture is necessarybecause the consistency of drill cuttings is different from the consistencyof drilling fluids. The purpose of the change in the procedure for aeratingthe suspended particulate phase is to minimize aeration and potential lossof volatile petroleum hydrocarbons present on or in the drill cuttings.In an effort to ensure that visual sheen observations are as reliable aspossible the Region is proposing that the following information be collectedand reported with each observation: The name of the observer; time of observation;the height of the observation point above sea level (e.g., 5 meters abovesea level, 20 meters above sea level); hours elapsed since the most recentdischarge of treated cuttings; atmospheric conditions (full sun or degreeof cloud cover); sea state; current direction and speed; a statement ofwhether the area observed for evidence of a sheen was in full sunlightor to what degree the area was shaded (by clouds, the platform or otherobjects); a statement that, to the best of the observer's ability, theobservation was made at a point downcurrent of the discharge; and the datedsignature of the observer. The Region may use its discretion to reduce the frequency of required monitoringobservations for individual facilities from the level that the demonstrationpermit initially requires of all facilities. The Region has proposed initialfrequent monitoring in this demonstration permit primarily in order todetermine an appropriate mathematical model of the pollutant content ofthe effluent from drill cuttings treatment technologies. In effect, theRegion proposes to conduct a quality control process capability study usingcontrol charts and other appropriate methods to ascertain the capabilityof these technologies to produce effluent of predictable quality. Therefore,it is proposed that when the Region is satisfied that it has sufficientdata to create an acceptable model of the performance of a particular treatmenttechnology at a particular site, it may choose to reduce the frequencyof required monitoring for that facility. In no case will the Region reducethe frequency of monitoring of any parameter to less than once per calendarmonth that the thermal or solvent extraction treatment equipment is operated.<ITAG tagnum="84">V. Other Legal Requirements </ITAG>A. State Certification Section 301(b)(1)(C) of the Act requires that NPDES permits contain conditionswhich ensure compliance with applicable state water quality standards orlimitations. Under section 401(a)(1) of the Act EPA may not issue a NPDESpermit until the state in which the discharge will originate grants orwaives certification to ensure compliance with appropriate requirementsof the Act and state law. State waters are not included within the areaof coverage by the draft permit, therefore state certification is not required.B. The Endangered Species Act Based on information in the general permit Ocean Discharge Criteria Evaluationand in the Environmental Impact Statements prepared for Federal Lease Salesin the Gulf of Mexico, the Region has concluded that the discharges authorizedby this general demonstration permit are not likely to adversely affectany endangered or threatened species nor adversely affect their criticalhabitat. The Region is requesting comments on this determination from theU.S. Fish and Wildlife Service and the National Marine Fisheries Service.The Region will consult with the services as is appropriate and otherwisewill comply with the requirements of section 7 of the Endangered SpeciesAct before issuing a final permit. C. The Coastal Zone Management Act The Coastal Zone Management Act (CZMA) requires that any federally permittedactivity affecting the coastal zone of a State with a federally approvedcoastal management program be subject to review for consistency with theState program. Because the discharges that would be allowed by this proposedgeneral demonstration permit would occur in Federal waters at least 1,000meters from the outer boundary of territorial sea, it is unlikely thatthe discharges would affect the coastal zone. Nevertheless, the Regionsare submitting a copy of this proposal and a certification of consistencyto the Louisiana Department of Natural Resources Coastal Management Division(Texas does not have a federally approved coastal zone management plan).Formal consistency review will begin when Louisiana receives a copy ofthe certification and other information required by 15 CFR 908.58. D. The Marine Protection, Research and Sanctuaries Act The Marine Protection, Research and Sanctuaries Act (MPRSA) establishesthe Marine Sanctuaries Program, implemented by the National Oceanic andAtmospheric Administration (NOAA), which requires NOAA to designate oceanwaters as marine sanctuaries for the purpose of preserving or restoringtheir conservation, recreational, ecological or aesthetic values. Section 302(f) of MPRSA requires that the Secretary of Commerce, afterdesignation of a marine sanctuary, consult with other federal agenciesand issue necessary regulations to control any activities permitted withinthe boundaries of the marine sanctuary. It also provides that no permit,license, or other authorization issued pursuant to any other authorityshall be valid unless the Secretary shall certify that the permitted activityis consistent with the purpose of the marine sanctuaries program and/orcan be carried out within its promulgated regulations. There are currentlyno marine sanctuaries in the Gulf of Mexico. E. Economic Impact (Executive Order 12291) The Office of Management and Budget has exempted this action from the reviewrequirements of Executive Order 12291 pursuant to section 5(b) of thatorder. F. The Paperwork Reduction Act (44 U.S.C. 3501 et seq.)  EPA has not previously issued a general demonstration permit. Thus, theAgency intends to either develop and submit to OMB for review a new informationcollection request specific to this activity or modify its collection ofinformation submissions made for the NPDES permit program and assignedOMB control numbers 2040-0086 (NPDES permit applications) and 2040-0004(discharge monitoring reports). All operators that choose to operate under this permit will need to performan onshore trial run of the technology that will be demonstrated (unlessa trial run meeting the requirements of part II.C.2 of this permit haspreviously been performed on an exact duplicate of the technology thatwill be used). EPA believes that contractor personnel may be used to performthese trial runs and has assigned a $50 per hour value to translate contractorcosts to burden hours. EPA estimates that it will take an affected facilityoperator 1,144 hours to perform such a trial run and submit the requisiteinformation to EPA. As 20 facilities are eligible for coverage under thispermit and EPA estimates that each technology for which a trial run isperformed will be demonstrated at three facilities, the total burden forthese trial runs would be 8,008 hours. All applicants will also need to submit a request for coverage under thispermit and a certification letter. As EPA estimates that it will take anapplicant four hours to prepare the request for coverage and certificationand 20 facilities are eligible for coverage, the total burden would be80 hours. All facilities choosing to operate under this permit will be required tosubmit discharge monitoring reports (DMRs). EPA estimates the first-yearDMR burden to be 5,726 hours per facility operator per year. The totalburden would be 114,520 hours. As EPA may reduce monitoring requirementsafter sufficient data are generated to demonstrate stable, reliable treatmentperformance, DMR burden in subsequent years may be less. The Agency invites the public to provide comments on EPA's estimate ofthe burden the information collection requirements of this draft permitwould impose. The Agency also invites comment on any other aspects of theproposed information collection requirements, including suggestions forreducing the proposed burden. In addition, the public is invited to sendcopies of its comments regarding this burden estimate or any other aspectof this collection of information, including suggestions for reducing thisburden, to Chief, Information Policy Branch, PM-223, U.S. EnvironmentalProtection Agency, 401 M St., SW., Washington, DC 20460; and to the Officeof Management and Budget, Paperwork Reduction Project (2040-0086 and 2040-0004),Washington, DC 20503, marked ``Attention: Desk Officer for EPA.'' G. Oil Spill Requirements Section 311 of the Act prohibits the discharge of oil and hazardous materialsin harmful quantities. Routine discharges specifically controlled by thispermits are excluded from the provisions of section 311. However, thispermit would not preclude the institution of legal action or relieve permitteesfrom any responsibilities, liabilities, or penalties for other, unauthorizeddischarges of oil or hazardous materials which are covered by section 311of the Act. H. The Regulatory Flexibility Act After review of the facts presented in the notice of intent printed above,I hereby certify, pursuant to the provisions of 5 U.S.C. 605(b), that thisgeneral demonstration permit will not have a significant impact on a substantialnumber of small entities. This certification is based on the fact thatthe regulated parties have greater than 500 employees and are not classifiedas small businesses under the Small Business Administration regulationsestablished at 49 FR 5024 <T3>et seq</T3>. (February 9, 1984). These facilities are classified asMajor Group 13_Oil and Gas Extraction SIC 1311 Crude Petroleum and NaturalGas.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: September 27, 1989.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Robert E. Layton Jr., </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Regional Administrator (6A). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">VI. Fact Sheet References </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">API. 1989. API 1989 Comments on Offshore Oil NSPS/BAT. Submitted inresponse to Notice of Data Availability. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">API. 1985. Standard procedure for field testing drilling fluids. APIRecommended Practice Bulletin 13B. 11th Edition, May 1985. API, Dallas,TX, pp 13-15. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Conoco, Inc. 1989. Comments on Notice of Data Availability and Requestfor Comments. Submitted January 18, 1989 to EPA/ITD. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">EPA. 1989a. Statistical Limitations for Oil Content on the DemonstrationPermit for Oil Reduction Technology. Memorandum from Charles E. White,Office of Water  Regulations and Standards to Thomas Wall, Office of WaterEnforcement and Permits. March 1, 1989. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">EPA. 1989b. Recalculation of Toxicity Estimates from Tests of Wastesthat were Generated by Thermal Treatment for Drill Cuttings. Memorandumfrom Charles E. White, Office of Water Regulations and Standards to ThomasWall, Office of Water Enforcement and Permits. September 8, 1989. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">EPA. 1989c. Burden Hour Estimates. Note to the Record File. Tom Wall,Office of Water Enforcement and Permits. September 28, 1989 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">EPA. 1988a. Notice of Data Availability and Request for Comments.Oil and Gas Extraction Point Source Category, Offshore Subcategory; EffluentLimitations Guidelines and New Source Performance Standards; New Informationand Request for Comments. 53 FR 41356, October 21, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">EPA. 1988b. Proposed EPA Method 1651, Total Oil and Diesel in DrillingFluids and Drill Cuttings by Retort Gravimetry and  GCFID. 53 FR 34628,Appendix A, October 21, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">EPA. 1985a. Drilling Fluids Toxicity Test. In Oil and Gas ExtractionPoint Source Category, Offshore Subcategory; Effluent Limitations Guidelinesand New Source Performance Standards; Proposed Rule. 50 FR 34831, Appendix3, August 26, 1985. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">EPA. 1985b. Methods for Measuring the Acute Toxicity of Effluentsto Freshwater and Marine Organisms. EPA/600/485/013. USEPA. March 1985</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">EPA. 1979. EPA Method 413.1, Oil and Grease, Gravimetric (extraction).Methods for Chemical Analysis of Water and Waste. EPA-600/74-79-020. USEPA.March, 1979. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">EPA Region VI. 1987. Demonstration Permits issued to Conoco. PermitNos. DP0601, DP0602. Notice of proposed permits published at 52 FR 10262.DP0602 modified and extended July, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Jones, Jr., M., J.A. Burgbacher, M. Churan, M. Hulse. 1983. Efficiencyof a Single-Stage Cuttings Washer with a Mineral Oil Invert Emulsion andits Environmental Significance. Presented at the 58th Annual TechnicalConference and Exhibition of the Society of Petroleum Engineers. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Kohlmann Ruggiero Engineers, P.C. 1988. Report on the Results of FieldSampling of Thermal Dynamics, Inc. Thermal Distillation Unit for the Treatmentof Drill Cuttings on Conoco South Pass 75 Platform. September 14-17, 1987.Final Draft. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Kubena, E., L.J. Gawel, S.E. Hawkins, and W.R. Moyer. 1988. FieldEvaluation of the TDI Oil-base Mud Drill Cuttings Processor-South Pass75. TSR 74-88-208-110. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Parrish, P.R., Montgomery, R.M., Friedman, S.D. 1988. Acute Toxicityof Drill Cuttings to Mysids (<T3>Mysidopsis bahia</T3>). Submitted to OWRS/ITD. February 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Shell. 1985. Survey Results on Use of Hydrocarbons for Fishing Operationsand Use of Hydrocarbons as Lubricity Agents. Attachments to J.A. Burgbacher,Shell Offshore letter to R.D. Ruddy, USEPA. October 30, 1985. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Standard Methods. 1980. Method 503D. Oil and Grease, Extraction Methodfor Sludge Samples. Standard Methods for the Examination of Water and Wastewater,APHA, AWWA, WPCF. 16th Edition. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Thermal Dynamics, Inc. 1988. Report on Field Evaluation of the TDIOil-Base Mud Drill Cuttings South Pass 75-A6. <T3>In</T3>: thermal Dynamics, Inc. Formal Request for Modification tothe General NPDES Permit. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Technical Resources, Inc. 1986. Minimal Volume Static Sheen Test.Memorandum from Gary Petrazzuolo, TRI to Edward Ovsenik, EPA, March 21,1986. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">GENERAL DEMONSTRATION PERMIT</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Permit No. GMG 8800070 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="85">Authorization To Discharge Under the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System </ITAG>In compliance with the provisions of the Federal Water Pollution ControlAct, as amended (33 U.S.C. 1251 <T3>et seq.: </T3>the ``Act''), operators of facilities in the OffshoreSubcategory of the Oil and Gas Extraction Point Source Category that EPARegion VI (``the Region'') approves to operate under this general demonstrationpermit are authorized to discharge certain residues from treatment of drillcuttings from mineral oil-based muds by thermal treatment processes orsolvent extraction processes to receiving waters named the Central andWestern Gulf of Mexico seaward of the outer boundary of the territorialseas in accordance with effluent limitations, prohibitions, monitoringrequirements, and other conditions set forth in parts I, II, and III hereof.Operators shall submit a written request for coverage to the Regional Administrator60 days before the intended commencement of discharge under this generaldemonstration permit. The request for coverage shall state that the operatorintends to be covered by this general demonstration permit and providecertain information about the operator and the location of the intendeddischarge (See part II.C.1.). The request for coverage shall be accompaniedby a five-point certification (See part II.C.2.). The Regional Administratorwill review the request for coverage and the certification and notify theapplicant in writing whether additional information is needed to completereview of the request for coverage; whether the request is denied; or whetherthe request for coverage is approved. Only operators who are authorized to discharge under general permit GMG280000(51 FR 24897 (July 9, 1986)) (``the general permit'') may be authorizedto discharge under this demonstration permit. All terms and conditionsof the general permit will continue to apply to operators covered by thisdemonstration permit except as specifically modified by this demonstrationpermit. This permit would allow the discharge of certain residues fromthe treatment of drill cuttings from mineral oil-based muds subject tolimitations on treated drill cuttings, condensed waters, condensed hydrocarbonsand the location of discharges. This demonstration permit also includesadditional definitions; monitoring, reporting and recordkeeping requirements;and notification requirements. For operators who are not currently authorizedto discharge under the general permit, a request for coverage under thegeneral permit must be submitted to the Region at the time the operatorrequests coverage under this demonstration permit. Operators shall notcommence discharging under this demonstration permit until after they havereceived written notification from the Region that their request for coveragehas been approved. Operators who fail to request coverage or who fail tosupply the information needed to process the request are not authorizedto discharge under this demonstration permit to the receiving waters named.The Regional Administrator will authorize discharges from no more than20 facilities under this demonstration permit. No more than seven (7) demonstrationsof any one vendor's technology will be authorized under this permit. This permit does not authorize discharges from ``new sources'' as definedin 40 CFR 122.2.This permit shall become effective at 1 p.m. Eastern Daylight Savings Timeon <T2>XXXXXXXX</T2> and shall expire five years from the effective date.<ITAG tagnum="21">Signed this September 27, 1989.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Myron O. Knudson,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Director, Water Management Division (6W), Region VI. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART I_GENERAL DEMONSTRATION PERMIT REQUIREMENTS</ITAG>Section A. Effluent Limitations and Monitoring Requirements 1. During the period beginning on the effective date and continuing throughthe date of expiration, the permittee is authorized to discharge TreatedDrill Cuttings From Mineral Oilbased Drilling Fluids in accordance withthe requirements of this demonstration permit. Such discharges shall belimited and monitored by the permittee as specified below: (a) Drill cuttings shall be treated prior to discharge by a thermal treatmentsystem or a solvent extraction treatment system that will reduce the oilcontent of the cuttings to 0.7l% by weight as a monthly average limit and1.16% by weight as a daily maximum limit as measured by the retort-gravimetricmethod (EPA Proposed Method 1651. See appendix A). Oil content shall bemeasured every two cumulative elapsed hours of operation of the drill cuttingstreatment system unless the Region has reduced the frequency of observationpursuant to part III.B.2. (b) No visible sheen shall result from any discharge of drill cuttingsauthorized by this demonstration permit. To determine compliance with thislimit, either a visual sheen test or a static sheen test shall be performed(see part III.C.6 for the requirements for performing and recording visualsheen test observations and Appendix B for the requirements for staticsheen observations). The receiving water shall be observed daily for avisible sheen as the discharge occurs. Under conditions of poor visibilitywhen a visual sheen test is not possible, a static sheen test shall beused to determine compliance with this limit; and (c) The toxicity of treated cuttings that are discharged shall be lessthan 30,000 parts per million (ppm) on a volume basis (andCx.18;1 per 1)of the test phase (i.e., the 96 hour LC<T2>50</T2> shall be greater than 30,000 ppm) when measured using the toxicitytest method specified in part III.C.2. The toxicity of treated cuttingsshall be measured at least once per week unless the Region has reducedthe frequency of observation pursuant to part III.B.2. In addition to the reporting requirements of the general permit, any violationsof these limitations shall be reported when the monitoring informationspecified in part III is reported. 2. During the period beginning on the effective date and continuing throughthe date of expiration, the permittee is authorized to discharge condensedor otherwise separated waters (``Condensed Waters'') from treatment ofdrill cuttings from mineral oil-based muds. Such discharges shall be limitedand monitored by the permittee as specified below: Any condensed waters that are discharged shall contain less than 48 milligrams(mg)/liter oil and grease as a monthly average limit and 72 mg/liter oiland grease as a daily maximum limit as measured by the gravimetric method(See part III.C.5). The oil and grease content of condensed or otherwiseseparated waters must be measured every two cumulative elapsed hours ofoperation of the drill cuttings treatment system unless the Region hasreduced the frequency of observation pursuant to part III.B.2. In addition to the reporting requirements of the general permit, any violationsof these limitations shall be reported when the monitoring informationspecified in part III is reported. 3. The discharge of condensed or otherwise separated hydrocarbons (``CondensedHydrocarbons'') from treatment of drill cuttings from mineral oil-basedmuds is specifically prohibited. In addition to the reporting requirementsof the general permit, any violation of this prohibition shall be reportedwhen the monitoring information specified in part III is reported. 4. The permittee must obtain approval from the U.S. Department of Interior,Minerals Management Service (MMS) and the U.S. Department of Transportation,U.S. Coast Guard, Marine Safety Office prior to operation of drill cuttingsthermal treatment systems or solvent extraction treatment systems underthis demonstration permit. Air emission test data required by the testrequirements in part III of this permit shall, in addition to EPA, be submittedto the MMS at the address below: <ITAG tagnum="24"/><T3>Regional Director, MMS, </T3><ITAG tagnum="26">1201 Elmwood Park Blvd., </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">New Orleans, Louisiana 70123-2394. </ITAG>Section B. Other Discharge Limitations 1. There shall be no discharge under this permit within 544 meters of anarea of biological concern, as defined in part III.D of the general permit.2. There shall be no discharge under this permit into receiving watersthat are less than 20 meters in depth as defined in part II.A.2 below.3. There shall be no discharge under this permit within 1,000 meters ofany State's territorial seas (as defined at section 502(8) of the CleanWater Act). <ITAG tagnum="52">PART II_STANDARD CONDITIONS FOR NPDES PERMITS </ITAG>Section A. Definitions 1. ``Central and Western Gulf'' means all lease blocks west of the westernboundary of Outer Continental Shelf lease areas identified as: Mobile,Viosca Knoll (north part), Destin Dome, Desoto Canyon, Lloyd, and Henderson.2. ``Waters having greater than 20 meters of depth'' means waters greaterthan 20 meters in depth as measured at mean low water. Section B. Monitoring and Records 1. For the discharges described in parts I.A.1 and I.A.2 of this demonstrationpermit, monitoring reports shall be submitted as specified in part III.B.3below. 2. Record Contents. The records of monitoring information required by thisdemonstration permit shall meet all requirements set forth in part IIIbelow.Section C. Notification Requirements Prospective permittees shall submit a request for coverage in accordancewith the requirements set forth below. The Region will review the requestfor coverage, determine the adequacy of the information submitted and,if necessary, request that the applicant supply additional information.Based on the information presented, the Region will decide whether to grantor deny the request for coverage. The Region will accompany all denialsof requests for coverage with detailed information as to why the requestwas denied. <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Request for Coverage</ITAG>Requests for coverage under this demonstration permit shall be made inwriting. The request for coverage shall be addressed to Region VI (PartIII.B.4) and include the legal name and address of the operator; identifythe lease block number assigned by the Department of Interior or, if none,the name commonly assigned to the lease area; identify the number and typeof facilities located within the lease block; and specify the facilityon which the cuttings treatment technology is proposed to be operated.All prospective permittees shall identify in their request for coverage:(1) The depth of water at the proposed demonstration site; and (2) thedistance from the proposed demonstration site to the outer boundary ofthe territorial seas. Prospective permittees located in lease blocks eitherin or immediately adjacent to MMS defined ``no activity'' areas shall alsoreport the distance from the proposed demonstration site to the ``no activity''area boundary. The request for coverage shall be accompanied by a signed and dated certificationby the applicant that: (1) The applicant has carefully reviewed the permitand understands its limitations, terms and conditions; (2) the locationof the proposed discharge complies with the location restrictions imposedby the permit; (3) an onshore trial run meeting the requirements of partII.C.2 of this permit has been completed; (4) the applicant has mailedto EPA all of the information required for documenting the design and performanceof the cuttings treatment technology to be employed (See part II.C.2);and (5) based on the applicant's careful evaluation of the data generatedduring the onshore trial run, the technology that will be demonstratedwill meet the limitations of the permit. The request for coverage shall be submitted at least 60 days prior to theproposed commencement of discharge. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Documentation of Cuttings Treatment Technology Design and Performance</ITAG>The following information shall be forwarded to the EPA Industrial TechnologyDivision (see part III.B.4) at the time the request for coverage is made:(a) Detailed process diagrams and narrative descriptions explaining howthe cuttings treatment technology operates. Any chemicals (including firesuppression system chemicals) and solvents that may be employed shall beidentified. The residence time of cuttings in the treatment unit shallbe identified, as well as key operating parameters (e.g., temperature ofthermal treatment chambers and the treatment capacity of the unit at itsdesign maximum, in barrels of cuttings per day). (b) Data from an onshore trial run of the treatment unit that is proposedto be operated under this demonstration permit. The onshore trial run shallconsist of a minimum of 24 hours of treatment equipment operation time.Throughput shall be at 25% of the design maximum for the first 12 hoursof operation and at 75% of the design maximum for the last 12 hours ofoperation. Samples shall be taken at the 1st, 3rd, and 5th hours of operationat both of these throughput rates. Data submitted shall include: (i) The amount by volume of each of the various wastestreams generated(including air emissions) and the amount by volume of cuttings treated;(ii) The oil content by weight of the raw and treated cuttings as measuredby the retort-gravimetric method specified in appendix A. Each pair ofsamples of raw and treated cuttings shall be taken so that the time betweencollection of the raw sample and the treated sample matches the residencetime of that sample of treated cuttings in the treatment unit; (iii) The oil and grease levels of condensed hydrocarbons and condensedwater as measured by the gravimetric method specified in part III.C.5;(iv) Results of static sheen tests performed on the raw and treated cuttingsas measured by the minimal volume static sheen test specified in appendixB; (v) The toxicity of the raw and treated cuttings as measured using themethod specified in part III.C.2. Each pair of samples of raw and treatedcuttings shall be taken so that the time between collection of the rawsample and the treated sample matches the residence time of that sampleof treated cuttings in the treatment unit;(vi) The toxicity of condensed waters as measured using the proceduresspecified in part III.C.3; (vii) The levels of total particulates, total hydrocarbons, SO<T2>X</T2>, NO<T2>X</T2> and CO in air emissions; (viii) Information on space requirements and weight of the equipment; (ix) Information on energy requirements. Electricity consumption shallbe described in kilowatt hours. Consumption of diesel or other fuels shallbe described in bbl/day for liquid fuel and scfm for gas fuels; (x) An operating and maintenance log indicating all hours of operationduring the trial, any maintenance performed and when it was performed;(xi) An estimate of the cost per barrel of cuttings treated, accompaniedby a description of all assumptions and information used in developingthe estimate; (xii) The levels of TSS, BOD, priority pollutants and dioxin in raw andtreated cuttings. Each pair of samples of raw and treated cuttings shallbe taken so that the time between collection of the raw sample and thetreated sample matches the residence time of that sample of treated cuttingsin the treatment unit; and (xiii) Whether the raw and treated cuttings pass the RCRA characteristichazardous waste tests (40 CFR part 261 subpart C). Each pair of samplesof raw and treated cuttings shall be taken so that the time between collectionof the raw sample and the treated sample matches the residence time ofthat sample of treated cuttings in the treatment unit. EPA will handle all information properly identified as confidential businessinformation according to the Agency's procedures for handling these materials.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART III_OTHER CONDITIONS </ITAG>Section A. General Demonstration Permit Area The area covered by this general demonstration permit includes those areasin the Central and Western Gulf of Mexico located in lease areas seawardof the outer boundary of the territorial seas that meet the location requirementsset forth in part I.B above. Section B. Test Requirements <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Operations Log </ITAG>The operator shall maintain a contemporaneous log of operations of thedrill cuttings treatment equipment while the equipment is installed atthe offshore facility. At a minimum, the operator shall: (a) Document the hours of operation of the equipment. The log shall indicateeach exact time of each calendar day that the equipment was started orshut down, including any process stream interruptions (see also part III.B.1.c)and also indicate the reason for each shut down or interruption that occurs.(b) Document the exact nature of routine or unscheduled maintenance thatis performed and fully describe the maintenance performed including theestimated labor expenditure and total cost of the maintenance; (c) Document the nature and cause of any abnormal operating conditionsof the treatment equipment. Abnormal operations are conditions which eitherthe permittee, operator, or vendor believe to be outside the normal operatingmode of the treatment equipment, including any peripheral or support equipment(e.g., materials handling systems; power supply; safety systems; air, water,solids, or other by-product handling systems). Any actions taken to correctabnormal operations, including the estimated labor expenditure and costof the remedial action(s) pertinent to returning the treatment equipmentto a normal operating condition shall be fully described and indicatedas unscheduled maintenance. (d) If air, water, solids or other media samples were collected duringa period of abnormal equipment operation, or if the permittee, operatoror vendor reasonably believes that such samples may have been collectedduring a period of abnormal equipment operation, the samples shall be identifiedas such in the operations log and identified as such in any data tabulations,summaries, and submissions. (e) The number of treatment equipment operators that are used to maintainnormal operation of the cuttings treatment equipment shall be documentedon a daily basis. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Monitoring </ITAG>The operator shall conduct monitoring as follows: (a) <T3>Feed rate. </T3>The volumetric feed rate of untreated cuttings to thetreatment equipment shall be recorded hourly during the operation of thetreatment equipment. This may be recorded as an estimate if it is not gaugedand if the method of estimation is documented. (b) <T3>Oil content of drill cuttings. </T3>The untreated drill cuttings fedto the treatment system and treated cuttings leaving the treatment systemshall be sampled once after each two cumulative elapsed hours of operationof the treatment system. Sample type shall be a grab sample. Each pairof samples of raw and treated cuttings shall be taken so that the timebetween collection of the raw sample and the treated sample matches theresidence time of that sample of treated cuttings in the treatment unit.The samples of treated cuttings shall be taken at a sampling location aftertreatment but prior to addition of seawater or any other material. Eachsample shall be analyzed by EPA proposed method 1651 for oil content asexpeditiously as practicable. A copy of proposed method 1651 is attachedin appendix A. The date, time, sample type (<T3>e.g., </T3>grab sample), facility identification, and description ofany actual or reasonably suspected abnormal operation of the treatmentsystem shall be documented concurrent with the procurement of each sample.Analytical results shall be labeled such that the above sample identificationand operations information can be readily and accurately cross-referenced.(c) <T3>Static sheen. </T3>Once per day for each day of operation of the cuttingstreatment equipment, one sample of treated drill cuttings shall be subjectedto the minimal volume static sheen test according to the test method specifiedin appendix B. The sample to be subjected to the static sheen test shallbe a subsample of a sample also taken for the purpose of measuring oilcontent, priority pollutant content and toxicity. The date, time, sampletype, facility identification, and description of any actual or reasonablysuspected abnormal operation of the treatment system shall be documentedconcurrent with the procurement of each sample. Analytical results shallbe labeled such that the above sample identification and operations informationcan be readily and accurately cross-referenced. Each documented analyticalresult for the static sheen test shall include an estimate of the percentageof surface area of the test container that exhibited a sheen. (Sheen isdefined in appendix B.)(d) <T3>Toxicity of drill cuttings. </T3>Once per week during operation ofthe cuttings treatment equipment, one pair of samples of raw and treateddrill cuttings shall be subjected to bioassay tests. This sample shallbe a subsample of a sample also taken for the purpose of measuring oilcontent, static sheen and priority pollutant content. The method to beused is specified in part III.C.2 below. Any actual or reasonably suspectedabnormal operation of the treatment system shall be documented concurrentwith the procurement of the sample. (e) <T3>Priority pollutant content of drill cuttings. </T3>Once per week duringoperation of the cuttings treatment equipment, one sample of treated drillcuttings shall be subjected to analyses for priority pollutants. This sampleshall be a subsample of a sample also taken for the purpose of measuringoil content, static sheen and toxicity. Any actual or reasonably suspectedabnormal operation of the treatment system shall be documented concurrentwith the procurement of the sample.The test methods to be used are EPA methods 1624 and 1625 for priorityorganics and an approved method under 40 CFR part 136 for priority inorganicpollutants. The date, time, sample type, facility identification, and description ofany actual or reasonably suspected abnormal operation of the treatmentsystem shall be documented concurrent with the procurement of each sample.Analytical results shall be labeled such that the above sample identificationand operations information can be readily and accurately with analyticalresults. (f) <T3>Volume, volumetric generation rate, and disposition of combined condensedhydrocarbon and water. </T3>Once per day for each day of operation of thecuttings treatment equipment, the volumetric generation rate of combinedcondensed hydrocarbons and water shall be documented (units: gallons perminute). This rate may be estimated if the waste-stream is not gauged andif the method of estimation is documented and reported. This informationshall be measured or estimated during a time interval when the treatmentequipment is known or reasonably expected to be operating under normalconditions. The volume generated during each day shall also be reported,as well as whether the value is measured or estimated; if estimated, themethod also must be documented. The method of disposal of all condensed hydrocarbon and condensed waterwastestreams shall be documented. (The discharge of hydrocarbons separatedfrom cuttings is prohibited.)(g) <T3>Volume, volumetric generation rate, disposition, oil content and toxicityof condensed water. </T3>Once per day for each day of operation of thecuttings treatment equipment, the volumetric generation rate of condensedwater (after separating the condensed hydrocarbons) shall be documented(units: gallons per minute). This may be estimated if the wastestream isnot gauged and if the method of estimation is documented. This informationshall be measured or estimated during a time interval when the treatmentequipment is known or reasonably expected to be operating under normalconditions. The volume generated during each day shall also be reported,as well as whether the value is measured or estimated; if estimated, themethod also must be documented.The normal disposition of the condensed water wastestream shall be documented.Once per day for each day of operation of the cuttings treatment equipment,the condensed water wastestream (after separating the condensed hydrocarbons)shall be sampled. An oil and grease analysis shall be conducted on eachsuch sample. The EPA-approved gravimetric method shall be used to analyzesuch samples (See part III.C.5). The date, time, sample type, facilityidentification, and description of any actual or reasonably suspected abnormaloperation of the treatment system shall be documented concurrent with theprocurement of each sample. Analytical results shall be labeled such thatthe above sample identification and operations information can be readilyand accurately cross-referenced.Once per week during operation of the cuttings treatment equipment, onesample of the condensed water shall be subject to bioassay tests. Thissample shall be a subsample of a sample taken for the purposes of measuringoil content. The toxicity test method to be used is specified in part III.C.3below.(h) <T3>Sluice Water. </T3>If water is used to sluice treated cuttings to thedischarge point, the normal rate of use of water used shall be documented(units: gallons per minute). (i) <T3>Power Consumption. </T3>The rate of electric power consumption by thecuttings treatment equipment (including peripheral equipment) under normaloperating conditions shall be documented (units: Kilowatts). If dieselor other fuels are used to power the equipment (rather than to produceelectricity to power the equipment), the rate of fuel consumption undernormal operating conditions shall be documented (units: bbl/day for liquidfuel, and scfm for gas fuels). (j) <T3>Solvent or Other Chemical Use. </T3>The operator shall document thechemical name, trade name, and volumes of all solvents or other chemicalsused in the treatment process. <ITAG tagnum="81">3. Changes in Frequency of Monitoring</ITAG>The frequency of the following monitoring requirements may be reduced atthe discretion of the Region. If after fifty (50) observations of a particularparameter the collected data show that the variation in the value of theparameter primarily results from a stable system of chance causes (ratherthan from factors such as cuttings throughput rate, kiln temperature ortime between servicing of the treatment equipment), the Region, upon writtenrequest by the permittee, may authorize an increase in the time intervalbetween samples for this parameter. Any reduced monitoring requirementsso authorized will be set forth in writing by the Region. Monitoring frequencywill in no case be reduced to less than once per calendar month that thetreatment equipment is operated. <ITAG tagnum="81">4. Reporting and Recordkeeping</ITAG>The operating logs and monitoring information that are required under partIII.B shall be summarized. These summaries and the original operating logsand monitoring information shall be reported to the Director, IndustrialTechnology Division (at the address given below) every three months. Adischarge monitoring report (DMR), covering the limitations for discharges(see part I.A.1. (a), (b), (c) and part I.A.2.) covered by this report,shall be forwarded to the Region (at the address given below) every threemonths. The reporting period for each operator covered by this demonstrationpermit shall begin on the effective date of the operator's coverage underthis permit. The first report is due on the 28th day of the fourth calendarmonth following the calendar month that includes the date that the operator'scoverage under the permit is effective. Thereafter, reports are due everythree months from the date that the first report was due. (For example,if March 21st is the effective date of an operator's coverage under thisdemonstration permit, the operator's first report is due on July 28th.This report must include all information collected between March 21st andJune 21st. The second report is due on October 28th.) All notices and reports required under this section shall be sent to:<ITAG tagnum="26"><T3>Director, Water Management Division (6W)</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Region VI, U.S. EPA</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">P.O. Box 50625</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Dallas, Texas 95270</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26"><T3>Director, Industrial Technology Division (WH-552)</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">U.S. EPA</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">401 M Street, SW.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Washington, DC 20460 </ITAG>Section C. Other Conditions <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Retort-gravimetric Method </ITAG>The approved test method for measuring the oil content of raw and treateddrill cuttings is the retort-gravimetric method. A copy of this methodis attached as appendix A. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Toxicity Test Method for Drill Cuttings </ITAG>The approved test method for measuring the toxicity of raw or treated drillcuttings is: U.S. Environmental Protection Agency Industrial Technology Division. August1985. Appendix 3_Drilling Fluids Toxicity Test Proposed Regulation forthe Offshore Subcategory of the Oil and Gas Extraction Point Source Category.50 FR 34592, at 34631 (August 26, 1985). The following deviations fromthis test method are required for the testing of drill cuttings:<ITAG tagnum="15">Sample Preparation (See section II-C(2) of the above cited test method).</ITAG>To prepare the suspended particulate test phase (SPP), the drill cuttings-to-seawaterratio of 1:9 must be based upon the drill cuttings, dry weight. (<T3>Example:</T3> add 100 grams of drill cuttings, on a dry weight basis,to 900 ml of seawater.) Dry weight of cuttings shall be determined by attaininga constant weight after dying in an oven at 104anddegrees;andplusmin;1anddegrees;C.Rather than mixing the drill cuttings: seawater mixture with a magneticstirrer, use a high-speed, high-shear stirrer and mix for 5 minutes.<ITAG tagnum="15">Sample Preparation (See section II-C(5) of the above cited test method).</ITAG>The filterable and unfilterable residue of each SPP need not be measured.If dissolved oxygen is less than 60% of saturation (4.9 ppm at 20 anddegrees;Cand 20 parts per thousand salinity), aerate the SPP, while stirring, foronly 3 minutes. Measure dissolved oxygen and, if necessary, aerate for3 minutes again. The date, time, sample type, facility identification, and description ofany actual or reasonably suspected abnormal operation of the treatmentsystem shall be documented concurrent with the procurement of each sample.Analytical results shall be labeled such that the above sample identificationand operations information can be readily and accurately cross-referenced.<ITAG tagnum="81">3. Toxicity Test for Condensed Waters </ITAG>The approved test method for measuring the toxicity of condensed watersis: A 96 hour static test performed according to EPA's acute toxicity testingmanual (See Methods for Measuring the Acute Toxicity of Effluents to Freshwaterand Marine Organisms, EPA/600/4-85/013). <T3>Mysidopsis bahia</T3> only shall be used as the test species. The testconditions described in Table 6, Recommended Test Conditions for Mysidsshall be followed. <ITAG tagnum="81">4. Static Sheen Test </ITAG>The approved static sheen test method is specified in appendix B.<ITAG tagnum="81">5. Gravimetric Method </ITAG>The approved method for measuring the levels of oil and grease in condensedwaters is: Method 413/1, Oil andamp; Grease, Gravimetric (extraction). Method for ChemicalAnalysis of Water and Waste, EPA-600/4-79-020, U.S. EPA, March 1979). See40 CFR part 136.3(a), table 1B, Parameter no. 41). <ITAG tagnum="81">6. Requirements for Visual Sheen Test Observations </ITAG>The visual sheen test is used to detect free oil by observing the surfaceof the receiving water for the presence of a sheen while discharging. Asheen is defined as a `silvery' or `metallic' sheen, gloss, or increasedreflectivity; visual color; or iridescence on the water surface. The operatorshall conduct a visual sheen test only at times when a sheen can be observedand not, without limitation, at night or when atmospheric or surface conditionsprohibit the observer from detecting a sheen (e.g., overcast skies, roughseas). At times when observation of a sheen is not possible, the minimalvolume static sheen method for detecting free oil shall be used. To conduct the visual sheen test, the observer must be positioned on therig or platform, relative to both the discharge point and current flowat the time of discharge, such that the observer can detect a sheen shouldit surface downcurrent from the discharge. For discharges that have beenoccurring for at least 15 minutes previously, observations may be madeany time thereafter. For discharges of less than 15 minutes duration, observationsmust be made, both during discharge and at 5 minutes after discharge hasceased. The following information shall be recorded with each observation for visualsheen: the name of the observer; time of observation; the height of theobservation point above sea level (e.g., 5 meters above sea level, 20 metersabove sea level); orientation of the observation point with respect tothe discharge point and current flow; hours elapsed since the most recentdischarge of treated cuttings; atmospheric conditions (full sun or degreeof cloud cover); sea state; current direction and speed; a statement ofwhether the area observed for evidence of a sheen was in full sunlightor to what degree the area was shaded (by clouds, the platform or otherobjects). The observer shall state whether or not a sheen was observedand sign and date the observation.<ITAG tagnum="85">Appendix A_Proposed Method 1651_Oil Content and Diesel Oil in DrillingMuds and Drill Cuttings by Retort Gravimetry and GCFID</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">1 Scope and Application</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1.1 This method is used to determine the oil content and the identityand concentration of diesel oil in drilling fluid (mud) samples. It isapplicable to all mud types and may also be used to determine the oil contentand diesel oil in drill cuttings.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1.2 This method may be used for compliance monitoring purposes aspart of the ``Effluent Limitations Guidelines and New Source PerformanceStandards for the Offshore Subcategory of the Oil and Gas Extraction PointSource Category''.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1.3 When this method is used to analyze samples for which there isno reference diesel oil, diesel oil identification should be supportedby at least one additional qualitative technique. Method 1625 providesgas chromatograph/mass spectrometer (GC/MS) conditions appropriate forthe qualitative and quantitative confirmation of the presence of the componentsof diesel oil (References 1-2).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1.4 The detection limit of this method is usually dependent upon thepresence of other oils in the sample. Excluding interferences, estimateddetection limits of 200 mg/kg of oil content and 100 mg/kg of diesel oilcan be obtained.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1.5 Any modification of this method beyond those expressly permittedshall be considered a major modification subject to application and approvalof alternate test procedures under 40 CFR 136.4 and 136.5.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1.6 The gas chromatography portions of this method are restrictedto use by or under the supervision of analysts experienced in the use ofgas chromatography and in the interpretation of gas chromatograms. Eachlaboratory that uses this method must generate acceptable results usingthe procedures described in sections 8.2 and 12 of this method.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">2 Summary of Method</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2.1 A weighed amount of drilling mud is distilled using a retort apparatus.The distillate is extracted with methylene chloride and the extract isdried by passage through sodium sulfate. The extract is evaporated to dryness,and the total amount of oil in the sample is determined gravimetrically.The oil is redissolved in methylene chloride, an internal standard is added,and an aliquot is injected into a gas chromatograph (GC). The componentsof the oil are separated by the GC and detected using a flame ionizationdetector (FID).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2.2 Identification of diesel oil (qualitative analysis) is performedby comparing the pattern of GC peaks (retention times and intensities)from the sample extract with the pattern of GC peaks from a reference dieseloil sample. Identification of diesel oil is established when the referencediesel and sample patterns agree per the criteria in this method.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2.3 Quantitative analysis of diesel oil is performed using an internalstandard technique.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">3 Contamination and Interferences</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3.1 Solvents, reagents, glassware and other sample processing hardwaremay yield artifacts and/or elevated baselines causing misinterpretationof chromatograms. All materials shall be demonstrated to be free from interferencesunder the conditions of the analysis by running method blanks initiallyand with each set of samples. Specific selection of reagents and purificationof solvents by distillation in all-glass systems may be required. Glasswareand, where possible, reagents are cleaned by solvent rinse or banking at450 degrees C for one hour minimum.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3.2 There is no standard diesel oil. Oil components, as seen by GC-FID,will differ depending upon the oil source, the production date, productionprocess, and the producer. In addition, there are three basic types ofdiesel oils: ASTM Designations No. 1-D, No. 2-D, and No. 4-D. The No. 2-Dis the most common ``diesel oil''; however, No. 2-D is sometimes blendedwith No. 1-D which has a lower boiling range. For rigorous identificationand quantification of diesel oil in a drilling fluid sample by GC-FID,the chromatographic pattern from the diesel oil should be matched withthe chromatographic pattern from a reference standard of the same dieseloil suspected to be in the sample.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3.3 To aid in the identification of interferences, the chromatographicpattern from a reference sample of drilling fluid prior to use is comparedto the chromatographic pattern of the drilling fluid after use. An interferenceis present when the pattern of the background oil does not match, but contributessubstantially to, the pattern of the diesel oil in the sample.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3.4 Mineral oils are often added to drilling fluids for lubricity.These oils, when examined by GC-FID, contain some components common todiesel oil but have chromatographic patterns that are distinctly differentfrom diesel oil. The analyst must first determine if the sample chromatogramshows the presence of diesel, mineral, or a combination of both beforereliable quantification can be performed. This method permits selectionof GC peaks unique to diesel oil for determination of diesel oil in thepresence of mineral oil. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">4 Safety</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4.1 The toxicity or carcinogenicity of each reagent used in this methodhas not been defined. Therefore, each chemical compound should be treatedas a potential health hazard. From this viewpoint, exposure to these chemicalsmust be reduced to the lowest possible level by whatever means available.The laboratory is responsible for maintaining a current awareness fileof OSHA regulations regarding the safe handling of the chemicals specifiedin this method. A reference file of material handling data sheets shouldalso be made available to all personnel involved in the chemical analysis.Additional references to laboratory safety are available and have beenidentified (references 3-5) for the information of the analyst. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4.2 Methylene chloride has been classified as a known health hazard.All steps in this method which involve exposure to this compound shallbe performed in an OSHA approved fume hood. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">5 Apparatus and Materials </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.1 Sample bottles for discrete sampling </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.1.1 Bottle_4 oz Boston round wide mouth jar with Teflon lined screwcap (Sargent Welsh S-9184-72CA, or equivalent). New bottles are used asreceived with no further cleaning required. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.1.2 Bottle mailer_to fit bottles above (Sargent-Welsh 2306, or equivalent).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.2 Distillation Apparatus </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.2.1 Retort_20 mL retort apparatus (IMCO Services Model No. R2100or equivalent). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.2.2 Glass wool_Pyrex (Corning 3950, or equivalent). Solvent extractedor baked at 450 degrees C for one hour minimum. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.3 Extraction/drying apparatus </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.3.1 Separatory funnel_60 mL with Teflon stopcock. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.3.2 Drying column_400 mmandmultiply;15 to 20 mm i.d. Pyrex chromatographiccolumn equipped with coarse glass frit or glass wool plug. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.3.3 Glass filtering funnel_crucible holder (Corning No. 9480, orequivalent). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.3.4 Spatulas_stainless stell or Teflon </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.4 Evaporation/concentration apparatus </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.4.1 Kuderna-Danish (K-D) apparatus </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.4.1.1 Evaporation flask_500 mL (Kontes K-570001-0500, or equivalent),attached to concentrator tube with springs (Kontes K-662750-0012). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.4.1.2 Concentrator tube_10 mL, graduated (Kontes K-570050-1025,or equivalent) with calibration verified. Ground glass stopper (size 19/22joint) is used to prevent evaporation of extracts. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.4.1.3 Snyder column_three ball macro (Kontes K-503000-0232, or equivalent).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.4.1.4 Snyder column_two ball micro (Kontes K-469002-0219, or equivalent).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.4.1.5 Boiling chips </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.4.1.5.1 Glass or silicon carbide_approximately 10/40 mesh, extractedwith methylene chloride and baked at 450 degrees C for one hr minimum.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.4.1.5.2 Teflon (optional)_extracted with methylene chloride. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.4.2 Water bath-heated, with concentric ring cover, capable of temperaturecontrol (andplusmin;2 degrees C), installed in a fume hood. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.4.3 Sample vials_amber glass, 1-5 mL with Teflon-lined screw orcrimp cap, to fit GC autosampler. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.5 Balances </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.5.1 Analytical_capable of weighing 0.1 mg. Calibration must be verifiedwith class S weights each day of use. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.5.2 Top loading_capable of weighing 10 mg. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.6 Gas Chromatograph (GC)_analytical system with split injection,capillary column, temperature program with initial and final isothermalholds, and all required accessories including syringes, analytical columns,gases, detector, and recorder. The analytical system shall meet the performancespecifications in Section 12. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.6.1 Column_30andplusmin;5 m andmultiply; 0.25andplusmin;0.02 mm i.d.,99 percent methyl, 1 percent vinyl, 1.0 um film thickness, bonded phasefused silica capillary (Supelco SPB-1, or equivalent). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.6.2 Detector_flame ionization. This detector has proven effectivein the analyses of drilling fluids for diesel oil, and was used to developthe method performance statements in Section 16. Guidelines for using alternatedetectors are provided in section 11.1.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.7 GC Data system_shall collect and record GC data, store GC runsin magnetic memory or on magnetic disk or tape, process GC data, computepeak areas, store calibration data including retention times and responsefactors, identify BC peaks through retention times, and compute concentrations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.7.1 Data acquisition_GC data shall be collected continously throughoutthe analysis and stored on a mass storage device.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.7.2 Response factors and calibration curves_the data system shallbe used to record and maintain lists of response factors, and multi-pointcalibration curves (section 7). Computations of relative standard deviation(coefficient of variation; CV) are used for testing calibration linearity.Statistics on initial (section 8.2) and ongoing (section 12.5) performanceshall be computed and maintained.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5.7.3 Data processing_the data system shall be used to search, locate,identify, and quantify the compounds of interest in each GC analysis. Softwareroutines shall be employed to compute and record retention times and peakareas. Displays of chromatograms and library comparisons are required toverify results.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">6 Reagents</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6.1 Sodium sulfate_anhydrous, (ACS) granular.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6.2 Methylene chloride_Nanograde or equivalent.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6.3 Reagent water_water in which the compounds of interest and interferingcompounds are not detected by this method.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6.4 Internal standard_dissolve 1.0 g of 1,3,5-Trichlorobenzene (KodakNo. 1801 or equivalent) in 100 mL methylene chloride. Store in glass andtightly cap with Teflon lined lid to prevent loss of solvent by evaporation.Label with the concentration and date. Mark the level of the meniscus onthe bottle to detect solvent loss.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6.5 Calibration standards_calibration standards are prepared fromthe same diesel oil expected to be in the sample; otherwise, No. 2 dieseloil is used. Calibration standards are prepared at the concentrations shownin table 1.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6.5.1 Weigh the appropriate amount of oil into a tared 10 mL volumetricflask and dilute to volume with methylene chloride.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6.5.2 Using a micropipet or microsyringe, transfer 100 uL of eachreference standard solution (section 6.5.1) to a GC injection vial. Add100 uL of the TCB internal standard (section 6.4) to each vial and mixthoroughly. Calibration standards are made fresh daily to avoid solventloss by evaporation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6.6 QC standard_used for tests of initial (section 8.2) and ongoing(section 12.5) performance. Prepare a reference mud sample containing 20,000mg/kg of diesel by adding 20.0 +/^ 0.2 mg of No. 2 diesel oil and 10.0+/^ 0.1 g of EPA Generic Mud No. 8 (reference 6) to a clean retort cup/see Section 10.1). Mix the mud and diesel oil thoroughly with a metal spatula.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">7 Calibration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7.1 Establish gas chromatographic operating conditions given in table2. Verify that the GC meets the performance criteria (section 12) and theestimated detection limit (section 1.4). The gas chromatographic systemis calibrated using the internal standard technique.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7.2 Internal standard calibration procedure_1,3,5-Trichlorobenzene(TBC) has been shown to be free of interferences from the diesel oils testedin the development of this method. However, if an interference is knownor suspected, the analyst must choose an alternate internal standard thatis free from interferences.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7.2.1 Inject 1 uL of each reference oil standard containing the internalstandard (Table 1 and section 6.5.2) into the GC-FID. The TCB will eluteapproximately 8.5 minutes after injection. For the GC-FID used in the developmentof this method, the TCB internal standard peak was 30 to 50 percernt offull scale at an attenuator setting of 8E-11 amp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7.2.2 Individual response factors</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7.2.2.1 Tabulate the peak area responses against concentration foreach of the 10 largest peaks in the chromatogram (excluding the solventpeak, the internal standard peak, and any peaks that elute prior to theinternal standard peak). (See section 13 for guidance on peak selection.)Calculate response factors (RF) for each peak using the following equation:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Equation 1:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,aw,i1,4,13</C> <H1>RF=</H1><H1>(A</H1><T2>s</T2>) (C<T2>is</T2>)<H2>(A</H2><T2>is</T2>) (C<T2>s</T2>)<ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">where:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A<T2>s</T2> = Area of the peak to be measured.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A<T2>is</T2> = Area of the internal standard peak.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C<T2>s</T2> = Concentration of the peak to be measured (mg/kg).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C<T2>is</T2> = Concentration of the internal standard (mg/kg).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7.2.2.2 If the RF is constant (andless;15% CV) over the calibrationrange (table 1), the RF can be assumed to be invariant and the averageRF can be used for calculations. Alternatively, the results can be usedto plot a calibration curve of response ratios, A<T2>s</T2>/A<T2>is</T2>, vs RF.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7.2.2.3 Calibration verification_the average RF or a point on thecalibration curve shall be verified on each working day by the measurementof one or more calibration standards. If the RF for any peak varies fromthe RF obtained in the calibration by more than +/^ 15 percent, the testshall be repeated using a fresh calibration standard. Alternatively, anew calibration curve shall be prepared.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7.2.3 Combined response factor_to reduce the error associated withthe measurement of a single peak, a combined response factor is used forcomputation of the diesel oil concentration. This combined response factoris the sum of the individual response factors as given in equations 2 or3:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Equation 2:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">RF combined = RF(1)+RF(2) . . . +RF(n)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Equation 3:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,aw,i1,14,1,29</C> <H1>RF combined</H1><H1>=</H1><H1>[A</H1><T2>s(1)</T2>+A<T2>s(2)</T2> . . . +A<T2>s(n)</T2>] (C<T2>is</T2>)<H2>(A</H2><T2>is</T2>) (C<T2>s</T2>)<ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">where:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">n is the number of individual peaks</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A<T2>s(1)</T2> . . . A<T2>(n)</T2> are the areas of the individual peaks.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">8. Quality Assurance/Quality Control</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.1 Each laboratory that uses this method is required to operate aformal quality assurance program (reference 7). The minimum requirementsof this program consist of an initial demonstration of laboratory capability,an ongoing analysis of standards and blanks as a test of continued performance,analyses of spiked samples to assess accuracy, and analysis of duplicatesto assess precision. Laboratory performance is compared to establishedperformance criteria to determine if the results of analyses meet the performancecharacteristics of the method.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.1.1 The analyst shall make an initial demonstration of the abilityto generate acceptable accuracy and precision with this method. This abilityis established as described in section 8.2.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.1.2 The analyst is permitted to modify this method to improve separationsor lower the costs of measurements, provided all performance requirementsare met. Each time a modification is made to the method, the analyst isrequired to achieve the estimated detection limit (section 1.4) and torepeat the procedure in section 8.2 to demonstrate method performance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.1.3 Analyses of spiked samples are required to demonstrate methodaccuracy. The procedure and QC criteria for spiking are described in section8.3.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.1.4 Analyses of duplicate samples are required to demonstrate methodprecision. The procedure and OC criteria for duplicates are described insection 8.4.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.1.5 Analyses of blanks are required to demonstrate freedom fromcontamination. The procedures and criteria for analysis of a blank aredescribed in section 8.5.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.1.6 The laboratory shall, on an ongoing basis, demonstrate throughcalibration verification and the analysis of the QC standard (section 6.6)that the analysis system is in control. These procedures are describedin section 12.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.1.7 The laboratory shall maintain records to define the qualityof data that is generated. Development of accuracy statements is describedin sections 8.3.4 and 12.5.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.2 Initial precision and accuracy_to establish the ability to generateacceptable precision and accuracy, the analyst shall perform the followingoperations:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.2.1 Retort, extract, concentrate, and analyze four samples of theQC standard (sections 6.6 and 10.1.3) according to the procedure beginningin section 10.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.2.2 Using results of the set of four analyses, compute the averagerecovery (X) in mg/kg and the standard deviation of the recovery (s) inmg/kg for each sample by the internal standard method (sections 7.2 and14.2).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.2.3 For each compound, compare s and X with the corresponding limitsfor initial precision and accuracy in table 4. If s and X meet the acceptablecriteria, system performance is acceptable and analysis of samples maybegin. If, however, s exceeds the precision limit or X falls outside therange for accuracy, system performance is unacceptable. In this event,review this method and the manufacturer's instructions, correct the problem,and repeat the test.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.3 Method accuracy_the laboratory shall spike a minimum of 20 percent(one sample in each set of five samples) of all drilling fluid samples.This sample shall be spiked with the diesel oil that was added to the drillingfluid. If a reference standard of diesel oil that was added to the drillingfluid is not available, No. 2 diesel oil shall be used for this spike.If doubt of the identity and concentration of diesel oil in any of theremaining 80 percent of the samples exists, that sample shall be spikedto confirm the identity and establish the diesel oil concentration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.3.1 The concentration of the spike in the sample shall be determinedas follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.3.1.1 If, as in compliance monitoring, the concentration of theoil in the sample is being checked against a regulatory concentration limit,the spike shall be at that limit or at one to five times higher than thebackground concentration determined in section 8.3.2, whichever concentrationis larger.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.3.1.2 If the concentration of the oil in a sample is not being checkedagainst a limit, the spike shall be at the concentration of the QC standard(section 6.6) or at one to five times higher than the background concentration,whichever concentration is larger.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.3.2 Analyze one sample aliquot to determine the background concentration(B) of oil content and of diesel oil. If necessary, prepare a standardsolution appropriate to produce a level in the sample at the regulatoryconcentration limit or at one to five times the background concentration(per section 8.3.1). Spike a second sample aliquot with the standard solutionand analyze it to determine the concentration after spiking (A) of eachanalyte. Calculate the percent recovery (P) of oil content and of dieseloil:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">P = 100 (A-B) / T</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">where T is the true value of the spike.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.3.3 Compare the percent recovery for oil content and for dieseloil with the corresponding QC acceptance criteria in Table 4. If the resultsof the spike fail the acceptance criteria, and the recovery of QC standardin the ongoing precision and recovery test (sections 10.1.3 and 12.5) iswithin the acceptance criteria in Table 4, an interference may be present(see sections 3 and 15 for identification of interferences). In this case,the result may not be reported for regulatory compliance purposes. If,however, the results of both the spike and the ongoing precision and recoverytest fail the acceptance criteria, the analytical system is judged to beout of control and the problem must be immediately identified and corrected,and the sample set reanalyzed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.3.4 As part of the QA program for the laboratory, method accuracyfor samples shall be assessed and records shall be maintained. After theanalysis of five spiked samples in which the recovery passes the test insection 8.3, compute the average percent recovery (P) and the standarddeviation of the percent recovery (s<T2>p</T2>). Express the accuracy assessment as a percent recovery intervalfrom P^2s<T2>p</T2> to P + 2s<T2>p</T2>. For example, if P = 90% and s<T2>p</T2> = 10% for five analyses of diesel oil, the accuracy intervalis expressed as 70 to 110%. Update the accuracy assessment on a regularbasis (e.g., after each 5 to 10 new accuracy measurements).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.4 The laboratory shall analyze duplicate samples for each drillingfluid type at a minimum of 20 percent (one sample for each five sampleset). A duplicate sample shall consist of a well-mixed, representativealiquot of the sample.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.4.1 Analyze one sample in the set in duplicate per the procedurebeginning in section 10.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.4.2 Compute the relative percent difference (RPD) between the tworesults per the following equation:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Equation 4:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,aw,i1,6,1,12,1,3</C> <H1>RPD</H1><H1>=</H1><H1>(D1 ^ D2)</H1><H2>(D + D2)/2</H2><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>100</H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">where:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D1=concentration of diesel in the sample</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D2=concentration of diesel oil in the second (duplicate) sample</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.4.3 The relative percent difference for duplicates shall meet theacceptance criteria in Table 5. If the criteria are not met, the analyticalsystem shall be judged to be out of control, and the problem must be immediatelyidentified and corrected, and the sample set reanalyzed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.5 Blanks_reagent water blanks are analyzed to demonstrate freedomfrom contamination.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.5.1 Extract and concentrate a reagent water blank initially andwith each sample set (samples started through the analysis on the sameday, to a maximum of 5 samples). Analyze the blank immediately after analysisof the QC standard (section 6.6) to demonstrate freedom from contamination.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.5.2 If any of the components of diesel oil or any potentially interferingcompound is detected in a blank, analysis of samples is halted until thesource of contamination is eliminated and a blank shows no evidence ofcontamination.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.6 Comparison of gravimetric and disel oil measurements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.6.1 Compare the concentration of the oil content (section 14.1.2)determined gravimetrically with the diesel oil concentration determinedby GCFID (section 14.2.2). If the diesel oil concentration exceeds thegravimetric oil concentration, the analysis has been performed improperly.Correct the error or repeat the sample analysis beginning with section10.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.7 The specifications contained in this method can be met if theapparatus used is calibrated properly, then maintained in a calibratedstate. The standards used for initial (section 8.2) and ongoing (section12.5) precision and recovery should be identical, so that the most preciseresults will be obtained. The GC instrument will provide the most reproducibleresults if dedicated to the seetings and conditions required for the analysesof the analyte given in this method.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8.8 Depending on specific program requirements, field replicates andfield spikes of diesel oil into samples may be required to assess the precisionand accuracy of the sampling and sample transporting techniques.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">9 Sample Collection, Preservation, and Handling</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">9.1 Collect drilling fluid samples in wide-mouth glass containersfollowing conventional sampling practices (reference 8).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">9.2 Samples must be representative of the entire bulk drilling fluid.In some instances, composite samples may be required.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">9.3 Maintain samples at 0 to 4 degrees C from the time of collectionuntil extraction.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">9.4 Sample and extract holding times for this method have not yetbeen established. However, based on tests of wastewater for the analytesdetermined in this method, samples shall be extracted within seven daysof collection and extracts shall be analyzed within 40 days of extraction.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">9.5 As a precaution against analyte and solvent loss or degradation,sample extracts are stored in glass bottles with Teflon lined caps, inthe dark, at ^20 to ^10 degrees C.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">10 Sample Extraction and Concentration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10.1 Retort</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10.1.1 Tare the retort sample cup and cap to the nearest 0.1 g. Transfera well homogenized and representative portion of the drilling fluid tobe tested into the sample cup. Do not fill the retort cup to the top sothat excess sample must be wiped off. Place the cap on the cup and reweigh.Record the weight of the sample to the nearest 0.1 g.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note:</T4> On agitation, most drilling fluids entrain air as smallbubbles. The extent of air entrainment is uncertain and is difficult todetect when the mud is poured into the retort cup. By weighing the drillingfluid, the quantitative detection of diesel oil is improved. In addition,by using a gravimetric measurement of the amount of sample, the retortcup does not need to be completely filled. This procedure avoids the errorthat occurs when the cup is filled and the oil rises to the surface ofthe sample and must be wiped off (as occurs if the manufacturer's instructionsare followed), thus resulting in a loss of oil.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10.1.2 Follow the manufacturer's instructions for retort of the drillingfluid. Substitute 6 g of loosely packed glass wool for the steel wool inthe manufacturer's instructions and distill the sample into a glass receiver.The presence of solids in the distillate require that the distillationbe rerun starting with a new portion of sample. Placing more glass woolin the retort expansion chamber, per the manufacturer's instructions, willhelp prevent the solids from being carried over in the distillation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10.1.3 QC standard_used for tests of initial (section 8.2) and ongoing(section 12.5) precision and accuracy. For the initial set of four samples(section 8.2) and for each set of samples started through the retort processon the same working day (to a maximum of five), prepare a QC sample asfollows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10.1.3.1 Place the QC standard (section 6.6) in the retort cup beginningin section 10.1.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10.1.3.2 Analyze the QC standard beginning with section 10.1.2 thenproceeding to section 10.2.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10.1.4 Blank_For the initial set of four samples (section 8.2) andfor each set of samples started through the retort process on the sameworking day (to a maximum of five), prepare a blank as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10.1.4.1 Place 10 mL of reagent water in a clean, tared, retort cupand weigh to the nearest mg. Record the weight of the reagent water.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10.1.4.2 Analyze the blank beginning with section 10.1.2 then proceedingto section 10.2.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10.2 Extraction and drying.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10.2.1 After the distillation is complete, pour the retort distillateinto a 60 mL separatory funnel. Quantitatively rinse the inner surfacesof the retort stem and condenser with methylene chloride into the separatoryfunnel. Rinse the receiver with two full receiver volumes of methylenechloride and add to the separatory funnel.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10.2.2 Stopper and shake the funnel for one minute, with periodicventing to prevent a buildup of gas pressure. Allow the layers to separate.Prepare a glass filtering funnel by plugging the botton with a piece ofglass wool and pouring in 1 to 2 inches of anhydrous sodium sulfate. Alternatively,a drying column may be used. Wet the funnel or column with a small portionof methylene chloride and allow the methlyene chloride to drain to a wastecontainer. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10.2.3 Place the glass filtering funnel or drying column into thetop of a Kuderna-Danish (K-D) flask equipped with a preweighed 10 mL receivingflask. Add a preweighed boiling chip to the receiving flask. Drain themethylene chloride (lower) layer into the glass filtering funnel or dryingcolumn, and collect the extract in the K-D flask. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10.2.4 Repeat the methylene chloride extraction twice more, rinsingthe retort with two thorough washings each time and draining each methylenechloride extract through the funnel or drying column into the K-D flask.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10.3 Concentration </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10.3.1 Place a Snyder column on the K-D flask. Prewet the Snyder columnby adding about one mL of methylene chloride to the top. Place the K-Dapparatus on a hot water bath (60 to 65 degrees C) so that the concentratortube is partially immersed in the hot water, and the entire lower roundedsurface of the flask is bathed with hot vapor. Adjust the vertical positionand the water temperature as required to complete the concentration in15 to 20 minutes. At the proper rate of distillation, the balls of thecolumn will actively chatter but the chambers will not flood with condensedsolvent. Concentrate the sample until it is free of methylene chloride.Remove the K-D apparatus from the hot water bath and allow to cool. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10.3.2 Weigh and record the final weight of the receiving flask. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10.3.3 Dissolve the oil in methylene chloride and adjust the finalvolume to 1.0 mL. If the extract did not concentrate to a final volumeof 1.0 mL or less, adjust the final volume to 10.0 mL. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">11. Gas Chromatography </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11.1 Table 3 lists the retention times that can be achieved underthe conditions in Table 2 for the n-alkanes of interest. Examples of separationsthat can be achieved are shown in Figure 1.\1\<NOTE/> Other retort devices, columns, chromatographic conditions,or detectors may be used if the estimated detection limits (section 1.4)and the requirements of section 8.2 are met. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\Figure 1_Sample Chormatograms, is not published in the<T4>Federal Register</T4> but is available in the public docket. See ``Addresses''section. <ITAG tagnum="21">11.2 Using a micropipet or microsyringe, transfer equal 100 andCx.18;Lvolumes of the sample extract or QC standard extract (section 10.3.3) andthe TCB internal standard solution (section 6.4) into a GC injection vial.Cap tightly and mix thoroughly. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11.3 Inject 1 andCx.18;L of the sample extract or reference standardinto the GC using the conditions in Table 2. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11.4 Begin data collection and the temperature program at the timeof injection. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11.5 If the area of any peak exceeds the calibration range of thesystem, make a 10-fold dilution of the extract (section 10.3.3), mix a100 andCx.18;L aliquot of this dilute extract with 90 andCx.18;L of the internalstandard solution (section 6.4), and reanalyze. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">12. System and Laboratory Performance </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">12.1 At the beginning of each working day during which analyses areperformed, GC calibration is verified. For these tests, analysis of the300 mg/mL calibration standard (table 1) shall be used to verify all performancecriteria. Adjustment and/or recalibration (per section 7) shall be performeduntil all performance criteria are met. Only after all performance criteriaare met may the QC standard, blank, and samples be analyzed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">12.2 Retention times </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">12.2.1 Retention time of the internal standard_the absolute retentiontime of the TCB internal standard shall be within the range of 7.96 to8.08 minutes. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">12.2.2 Relative retention times of the n-alkanes_the retention timesof the n-alkanes relative to the TCB internal standard shall be withinthe limits given in table 4. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">12.3 Calibration verification </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">12.3.1 Compute the response factor for each peak by the internal standardtechnique (section 7.2). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">12.3.2 For each peak, compare the response factor with the responsefactor from the initial calibration (section 7.2.2). If all response factorsare within andplusmin;15 percent of their respective values in the initialcalibration, system calibration has been verified. If not, prepare a freshcalibration standard and repeat the test (section 12.1), or recalibrate(section 7). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">12.4 Multiple GC peaks_each n-alkane shall give a single, distinctGC peak. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">12.5 Ongoing precision and accuracy </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">12.5.1 Compute the oil content concentration and the concentrationof diesel oil in the QC standard in each sample set (section 10.1.3) priorto analysis of any sample in the set. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">12.5.2 Compare the concentration with the QC limit in Table 4. Ifthe concentrations of oil content and of diesel oil in the QC standardmeet the acceptance criteria, system performance is acceptable and analysisof samples may proceed. If, however, the concentrations do not meet theacceptance criteria, system performance is unacceptable. In this event,correct the problem, reprocess the sample set (section 10), and repeatthe ongoing precision and accuracy test (sections 10.1.3 and 12.5). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">12.5.3 Add results that pass the specifications in section 12.5.2to initial and previous ongoing data. Update QC charts to form a graphicrepresentation of continued laboratory performance. Develop statementsof laboratory accuracy for oil content and diesel oil in drilling fluidsby calculating the average percent recovery (R) and the standard deviationof percent recovery (s<T2>r</T2>). Express the accuracy statement as a recovery interval fromR ^ 2 S<T2>r</T2> to R2 + S<T2>r</T2>. For example, if R = 95 percent and S<T2>r</T2> = 5 percent, the accuracy is 85 to 105 percent.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">13. Qualitative Determination </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">If less than 10 GC peaks (excluding the solvent peak, the internalstandard peak, and any peaks that elute prior to the TCB internal standardpeak) are present in the analysis of the sample, and the QC tests (sections8 and 12) for the sample set are acceptable, diesel oil is not presentin the sample. If 10 or more GC peaks are present in the analysis of thesample, diesel oil is identified by comparing the relative retention timesand relative areas of peaks from the analysis of the concentrated extractof a mud sample to the relative retention times and relative areas of peaksfrom the reference standard. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">13.1 Relative retention times_the n-alkane peaks (table 3) shall bewithin the limits in table 3. If the relative retention times are not withinthese limits, repeat the analysis of the reference diesel oil and the analysisof concentrated extract of the mud sample and compare the relative retentiontimes. If the relative retention times of the n-alkane peaks do not agree,the retention times of the 10 largest components that agree within andplusmin;1 percent are used for the identification of diesel oil (per section 13.2)and for determination of the concentration of diesel oil in the mud sample(per section 14). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">13.2 Distribution of peak area ratios (Reference 9)_diesel oil isfurther identified by comparing the distribution of the area ratios ofpeaks in the chromatogram of the calibration standard (section 6.5) tothese same ratios in the chromatogram of the sample. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">13.2.1 Compare the chromatograms of the calibration standard and thesample. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">13.2.2 Select the 10 peaks largest in area in the chromatogram ofthe sample that are in relative retention time agreement with the correspondingpeaks in the calibration standard (section 13.1) and appear to be uniqueto the calibration standard. Exclude the solvent peak, the internal standardpeak, any peaks that elute prior to the internal standrd peak, and anymultiplet and unresolved peaks. For most samples, these will be the n-alkanepeaks. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">13.2.3 Using the largest peak of the 10 peaks as reference, dividethe area of each of the other nine peaks by the area of this largest peak.Repeat this division process for the same 10 peaks in the calibration standard.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">13.2.4 Compare the ratios of areas of the nine peaks in the samplewith the respective ratios of the areas of the nine corresponding peaksin the reference standard. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">13.2.4.1 If all of these ratios agree within andplusmin; 21 percent,diesel has been positively identified. The quantity of diesel oil is thendetermined per section 14. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">13.2.4.2 If any of the ratios do not agree within andplusmin; 21 percent,an interference is suspected. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">13.2.4.3 If other peaks can be found that agree in relative retentiontime (section 13.1) and in ratio (section 13.2.4.1), use these peaks forquantitation per section 14. If 10 peaks that agree cannot be found, Method1625 (Revision C or greater) shall then be used to determine the presenceand concentrations of the polynuclear aromatic hydrocarbons (PAH's) presentin the sample. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">14. Quantitative Determination </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">14.1 Oil content by gravimetry </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">14.1.1 Subtract the weight of the preweighed receiving flask and boilingchip (section 10.2.3) from the final weight of the receiving flask (section10.3.2). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">14.1.2 Calculate the concentration of oil content in the sample usingthe following equation:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Equation 5:  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,11,4,6  </C>   <H1>C (mg/kg)=  </H1><H1>W</H1><T2>f</T2>  <H2>W</H2><T2>s</T2>  <H1>andmultiply; 1000  </H1>  <ITAG tagnum="22">   </ITAG></ITAG>  <ITAG tagnum="20">where:  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">W<T2>f</T2>=final weight of oil in mg (from section 14.1.1)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">W<T2>s</T2>=wet weight of sample in grams (from section 10.1.1) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">14.2 Diesel oil by gas chromatography  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">14.2.1 Compute the concentration of diesel oil in the sample extractusing the combined response factor given in section 7.3.3 for the 10 largestpeaks chosen in section 13 using the following equation:  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Equation 6:  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,12,24  </C>   <H1>C</H1><T2>ex</T2> (mg/mL) =  <H1>(C</H1><T2>is</T2>) [A<T2>s(1) </T2>+A<T2>s(2)</T2> . . . +A<T2>s(n)</T2>]  <H2>(A</H2><T2>is</T2>) (RF combined)    <ITAG tagnum="22">   </ITAG></ITAG>  <ITAG tagnum="20">where:  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">C<T2>ex</T2> is the concentration of the oil in the extract </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">14.2.2 Calculate the concentration of diesel oil (in mg/kg) in thesame as follows:  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Equation 7:  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,12,12,6  </C>   <H1>C (mg/kg)=  </H1><H1>(C</H1><T2>ex</T2>) (V<T2>ex</T2>)  <H2>(W</H2><T2>s</T2>)  <H1>andmultiply; 1000  </H1>  <ITAG tagnum="22">   </ITAG></ITAG>  <ITAG tagnum="20">where:  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">V<T2>ex</T2>=final extract volume in mL (from section 10.3.3 or 14.2.3) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">W<T2>s</T2>=wet weight of sample in grams (from section 10.1.1) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">14.2.3 If the area of any peak in the chromatographic pattern exceedsthe calibration range of the GC, the extract is diluted by a factor of10 with methylene chloride, 100 uL is withdrawn and mixed with 90 uL ofthe international standard solution (section 6.4) and the diluted extractis reanalyzed.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">14.3 Results of analyses of drilling fluids are reported in unitsof mg/kg (wet weight) to three significant figures. Results for samplesthat have been diluted are reported at the least dilute level at whichthe peak areas are within the calibration range (section 14.2.3).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">15. Complex Samples.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">15.1 The most common interference in the determination of diesel oilis from mineral oil in the drilling fluid (see sections 3 and 13). Drillingfluids may also contain proprietary lubricity additives that can interferewith the identification and quantification of diesel oil.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">15.2 The presence of mineral oil or other interfering oils and additivescan often be determined by comparing the pattern of chromatographic peaksin the sample with the patterns of chromatographic peaks in the referencestandard (sections 6.5 and 10.1.3) and in the spiked sample (section 8.3).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">15.3 In cases where there is a mixture of diesel and mineral oil,the analyst may have to choose some of the smaller early or late elutingpeaks present in the chromatographic pattern of the diesel oil, and notpresent in the chromatographic pattern of the mineral oil, to determinethe diesel content. Quantification using these peaks is performed by usingthese peaks for calibration (section 7) and for determination of the finalconcentration (section 14).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">16. Method Performance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">16.1 This method was developed by two laboratories that tested fordiesel oil drilling fluids (mainly drilling muds) over a two-year period.The performance data for this method are based on the performance of themethod in these two laboratories (reference 10).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">16.2 The most commonly occurring drilling fluid in the tests of thismethod was a seawater lignosulfonate mud (EPA Generic Mud No. 8). The estimateddetection limit for diesel oil in this mud is 100 ug/kg.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">References:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Brown, John S, ``Organic Chemical Characterization of Diesel andMineral Oils Used as Drilling Mud Additives'', Proceedings of Tenth AnnualAnalytical Symposium, USEPA, Industrial Technology Division (WH-552), 401M St, Washington DC 20460, March 19-20, 1986.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Brown, John S, ``Final Report for Research Program on: OrganicChemical Characterization of Diesel and Mineral Oils Used as Drilling MudAdditives'', Phase II, Contract Reference Agreement No. 501-P-5476R, toOffshore Operators Committee, Environmental Subcommittee, Houston, TX,Prepared by Battelle Ocean Science and Technology Department, 397 WashingtonSt, Duxbury MA 02332.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. ``Carcinogens_Working With Carcinogens'', Department of Health,Education, and Welfare, Public Health Service, Center for Disease Control,National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health, Publication No.77-206, August 1977.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. ``OSHA Safety and Health Standards, General Industry'', (29 CFR1910), Occupational Safety and Health Administration, OSHA 2206 (Revised,January 1976).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. ``Safety in Academic Chemistry Laboratories'', American ChemicalSociety Publication, Committee on Chemical Safety, 3rd Edition, 1979.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. Available through the EPA Sample Control Center, P.O. Box 1407,Alexandria, VA 22313 (703-557-5040).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. ``Handbook of Analytical Quality Control in Water and WastewaterLaboratories'', USEPA, EMSL, Cincinnati, OH 45268, EPA-600/4-79-019 (March1979).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8. ``Standard Practice for Sampling Water'', ASTM Annual Book of Standards,ASTM, Philadelphia, PA 76 (1980).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">9. Boehm, Paul D., and Sauer, Theodore C., ``Review and Evaluationof Draft EPA Method 1651 Total Oil and Diesel Oil in Drilling Dischargesby Retort Gravimetry and GC-FID'', Battelle Ocean Sciences, 397 WashingtonSt., Duxbury, MA 02332 (March 4, 1988).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10. Rushneck, D. R., and Eynon B. P., ``Precision and Recovery Analysisof DPMP Diesel Measurements'', Memorandum to Dennis Ruddy, USEPA, IndustrialTechnology Division (WH-552), 401 M St SW., Washington DC 20460 (23 August1987, draft).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table</T4> 1._<T4>Concentration of Calibration Standards </T4><H1>Expected concentration in sample </H1><H1>Wt of Diesel oil in 10 mL volumetric \1\ (g) </H1><H1>Concentration in standard</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">50,000 mg/kg <D>use undiluted oil </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">30,000 mg/kg <D>7.6 </D><D>760 mg/mL. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">10,000 mg/kg <D>3.0 </D><D>300 mg/mL. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5,000 mg/kg <D>1.5 </D><D>150 mg/mL. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2,000 mg/kg <D>0.6 </D><D>60 mg/mL. </D><F>\1\ Weigh oil to the nearest mg.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>1,L0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s100 </C><T4>Table</T4> 2._<T4>Gas Chromatographic Operating Conditions_Method</T4> 1651 \1\ <H1> </H1> Injection port, transfer line, and detector temperatures=275 deg. C Column temperature program: <ITAG tagnum="12">Initial temperature: 90 deg. C </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">Initial time: 0 minute</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">Ramp: 90-250 deg. C at 5 deg. C per minute </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">Final temperature: 250 deg. C </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">Final hold: 10 minutes or until all peaks have eluted. </ITAG>Carrier gas and flow rates: <ITAG tagnum="12">Carrier: nitrogen or helium </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">Velocity: 20-40 cm/sec at 90 deg. C </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">Split ratio: 80:1-120:1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">Makeup gas: as required by manufacturer </ITAG>Hydrogen and air flow rates: as specified by manufacturer Detector amplifier settings: 10-11 amp full scale. Attenuation is <ITAG tagnum="12">Adjusted so that the highest peaks are on scale in the most concentratedstandard. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">Recorder: Chart speed of 1-2 cm/min (fixed). </ITAG><F>\1\ Conditions are approximate and can be adjusted to meet the performancecriteria in section 12.</F></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,s30,6,14 </C><T4>Table</T4> 3._<T4>Retention Times and Relative Retention Time Limits for Major Componentsof Diesel Oil_Method</T4> 1651 <H1>Compound </H1><H1>Retention time </H1><H2>Mean </H2><H2>Relative</H2> <ITAG tagnum="1">TCB <D>8.0 </D><D>1.00 to 1.00 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">n-C12 <D>9.9 </D><D>1.22 to 1.24 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">n-C13 <D>12.6 </D><D>1.55 to 1.57 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">n-C14 <D>15.3 </D><D>1.89 to 1.92 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">n-C15 <D>17.9 </D><D>2.21 to 2.25 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">n-C16 <D>20.4 </D><D>2.52 to 2.56 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">n-C17 <D>22.9 </D><D>2.82 to 2.88 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">n-C18 <D>25.2 </D><D>3.12 to 3.15 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">n-C19 <D>27.3 </D><D>3.39 to 3.43 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">n-C20 <D>29.4 </D><D>3.66 to 3.71 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">n-C21 <D>31.5 </D><D>3.90 to 3.97 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">n-C22 <D>33.4 </D><D>4.14 to 4.21 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">n-C23 <D>35.3 </D><D>4.37 to 4.45 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">n-C24 <D>37.1 </D><D>4.58 to 4.59</D></ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table</T4> 4._<T4>QC Acceptance Criteria for Precision and Recovery_Method </T4>1651<H1>Analyte </H1><H1>Test concentration (mg/kg) </H1><H1>Limit for s (mg/kg) </H1><H1>Range for X (mg/kg) </H1><H1>Range for P (mg/kg)</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">Oil Content <D>20,000 </D><D>3,400 </D><D>18,000 to 23,700 </D><D>16,700 to 24,900 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">By graviemtry <D>\1\ n </D><D>0.17n </D><D>0.88n to 1.16n </D><D>0.82n to 1.22n </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Diesel oil by GC <D>20,000 </D><D>3,600 </D><D>17,200 to 20,300 </D><D>13,600 to 21,400 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>\1\ n </D><D>0.18n </D><D>0.80n to 1.08n </D><D>0.73n to 1.14n </D><F>\1\ For other test concentrations in the range of 1,000-50,000 mg/kg,assuming a spike to background ratio of 5:1.</F></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,i1,s30,8,8 </C><T4>Table</T4> 5._<T4>QC Acceptance Criteria for Duplicates_Method </T4>1651 <H1>Concentration detected (mg/kg) </H1><H1>Relative percent difference </H1><H2>Oil content </H2><H2>Diesel oil</H2> <ITAG tagnum="1">500 <D>36 </D><D>94 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">750 <D>30 </D><D>68 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1,000 <D>28 </D><D>54 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2,000 <D>24 </D><D>34 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5,000 <D>21 </D><D>22 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">10,000 <D>21 </D><D>18 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">20,000 <D>20 </D><D>16 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">50,000 <D>20 </D><D>15</D></ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix B_Minimal Volume Static Sheen Test</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">1. Scope and Application</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This method is to be used as a compliance test for the ``no dischargeof free oil'' requirement for discharges of drilling fluids, drill cuttings,deck drainage, produced sand, and well treatment fluids. Free oil refersto any oil contained in a water steam that when discharged will cause afilm or sheen on or a discoloration of the surface of the receiving water.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">2. Summary of Method</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Samples of drilling fluids, deck drainage, or well treatment fluids(5 mL) and samples of drill cuttings or produced sand (15 g, wet weightbasis) are introduced into a 125 mL sample container (surface area approximately26.5 cm\2\, or 4.1 in\2\) with test water from a drinking-quality watersource. Fluid samples are introduced by automatic pipet into the containerafter filling with test water; samples of solids are introduced prior ofadding test water. Minimum agitation is required when adding the fluidsample or the receiving water. Observations are made immediately and fiveminutes later. To aid in interpretation, an oil-fee drilling fluid blankand a 0.5% (v/v) oil-contaminated drilling fluid standard are tested concurrentlywith effluent samples. Observations are made to ascertain if these materialscause a sheen, iridescence, gloss, or increased reflectance on the surfaceof the test water. The occurrence of any of these visual observations willconstitute a demonstration that the tested material contains ``free oil'',and therefore, results in a prohibition on its discharge into receivingwaters.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">3. Interferences</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Residual ``free oil'' adhering to sampling containers and the stainlesssteel spatual used to transfer drill cuttings or produced sand will bethe principla sources of contamination problems. These problems shouldonly occur if improperly washed and cleaned equipment are used for thetest. The use of disposable equipment minimizes the potential for similiarcontamination from pipets and test containers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">4. Apparatus, Materials, and Reagents</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4.1 <T3>Apparatus</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4.1.1 Sampling containers_1 L polyethylene screw-cap containers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4.1.2 Graduated cylinder_100 mL graduated cylinder required only foroperations where predilution of mud discharges is required.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4.1.3 Triple-beam scale</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4.1.4 Automatic pipet capable of delivering 5 mL volumes of test samples,and disposable polypropylene pipet tips. (Equivalent to Oxford MACRO-SET5-10 mL transfer pipet, product number 8885-890502 and MACRO-SET 5-10.mL pipet tips, approximately 132 mm x 11 mm, product number 8885-081508.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4.1.5 Stainless steel spatual</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4.1.6 Test container_120 mL (4 oz) polypropylene or polyethylene specimenor sample cups, with or without screw-cap covers; approximate dimensions72 mm high x 60 mm top diameter (od) 48 mm bottom diameter (od). Surfacearea is approximately 26.5 cm\2\ (29 mm id). (Equivalent to Fisherbrand118 mL clear polypropylene screw-cap containers, product number 14-375-112Aor Lab-Tek 4 oz polyethlyene disposable cups, product number 4719.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4.2 <T3>Materials and Reagents</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4.2.1 Test water_from a drinking-quality water source.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4.2.2 Oil-free generic drilling fluids.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4.2.3 Samples of diesel oil or mineral oil, added either directlyor as a component of a complex additive, or diesel oil from the rig's fuelsupply.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">5. Calibration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">None currently specified.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">6. Quality Control Procedures </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Both negative control and positive control samples are tested concurrentlywith the effluent test sample. The negative control consists of an oil-freesample of the type of generic mud that is being used at the time that samplingwas performed. The positive control is this same generic mud to which a0.5% (v/v) spike of oil has been freshly added (within 12 hours, if tightlysealed in a screw-capped container; within 1 hour if left open to air).The added oil should be one of the following: (a) If no oil or oil-basedadditives have been used in the mud system, diesel oil from the rig's fuelsupply; (b) if a specific diesel or mineral oil has been used in the mudsystem, a sample of that oil.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">7. Sample Collection and Handling </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.1 Sampling containers must be thoroughly washed with detergent,rinsed a minimum of three times with fresh water, and allowed to air drybefore samples are collected. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.2 Samples of drilling fluid must be obtained once per day from theactive mud pit; the sample volume should range between 200 mL and 500 mL.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.3 Samples of drill cuttings or produced sand must be obtained fromeach type of solids control equipment from which discharges occur on anygiven day prior to addition of any washdown water; samples should rangebetween 200 g and 500 g.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.4 Samples of deck drainage or well treatment fluids must be obtainedfrom holding facility prior to discharge; the sample volume should rangebetween 200 mL and 500 mL. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.5 Samples must be tightly sealed with screw-cap enclosures immediatelyafter sample collection and tested no later than 1 hour after collection.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.6 If predilution is imposed as a permit condition, drilling fluidsamples must be diluted at the same ratio with the same prediluting wateras the discharged muds until the slurry is homogenously mixed. Muds shouldbe mixed in screw-cap sampling containers by shaking. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">8. Procedure </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">8.1 Test water that will be used as ``receiving water'' in the testmust be obtained from a drinking-quality source of water. The test containermust have an air to liquid interface area of 26.5andplusmin;2.5 cm2. Thesurface of the water should be no more than 1 cm below the top of the testcontainer. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">8.2 Drilling fluid materials, well treatment fluids, or deck drainagemust be sampled by introducing the disposable pipet tip of the automaticpipet 1.5 inches below the surface of the effluent. Fluid is withdrawnfrom the effluent sample and carefully transferred to the test containerwithout cleaning or scraping the pipet tip or touching it to the sidesof either the effluent sample container or the test container. The pipettip must be introduced into the test water at least 1.5 inches below itssurface level and the test material then slowly injected into the testwater. Care must be taken to keep the pipet tip as stationary as possiblewhile expelling the sample to avoid creating turbulence in the test container.Care also must be taken to avoid discharging air bubbles, which can occurespecially for viscuous muds, and which generally occur when most of thesample has been expelled. Test containers and pipet tips must be used onlyonce and discarded. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">8.3 Drill cuttings or produced sand should be transferred from thesampling container directly into test containers. Test containers shouldbe tared and 15 g of wet solids added to the container. Test water shouldbe added slowly; the container should be tipped slightly so that watercan be added along the wall of the container and not directly onto thesolids material at the bottom of the container. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">8.4 Observations must be made immediately and 5 minutes after thetest material is transferred to the test container. Viewing points abovethe test container should be made from at least 3 perspectives of the testcontainer, at viewing angles of approximately 60anddegrees; and 30anddegrees;from the horizontal. Illumination of the test container must be representativeof adequate lighting for a working environment to conduct routine laboratoryprocedures. The order for the testing should be (1) the negative control,(2) the positive control, (3) the test sample(s).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">8.5 Detection of a ``silvery'' or ``metallic'' sheen, gloss, or increasedreflectivity; visual color; or iridescence on the surface of the test watershall constitute a demonstration of ``free oil.'' These visual observationsinclude droplets, patches, streaks, or sheets of such altered surface characteristics.Generally, the appearance of free oil, as oil content increases, will proceedfrom droplets to swirls or streaks, to patches or sheets. With increasingtime, the larger surface forms generally break down into the smaller forms,i.e., sheets will cast off swirls, which further disaggregate into droplets.Irridescence, i.e., a multi-color appearance of the oil film, is generallya transient phenomenon. It may occur immediately after the test materialis added (or test water in the case of effluent solids), but as the filmspreads and its thickness decreases, color will degenerate into a ``silvery''appearance, or areas of increased light reflectance. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Addendum </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Section 8.5_Interpretation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Several interferences in detecting a sheen can occur with drillingfluids. Two of these are bubbling or foaming in the test container andparticulate surface deposits. Bubbles may be formed when pipetting thetest sample into test water (especially for viscous muds) and some muds(e.g., lime muds) may foam or effervesce for a short time when added totest water. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Bubbles may interfere with the ability to detect oil, leading to falsenegative responses. Care must be taken to carefully observe the instantthat the pipette tip touches the surface of the test water and the firstfew seconds thereafter. However, it is also useful to wait a minute ortwo and recheck the test containers to determine if a sheen has developedafter foaming has stopped and bubbles have broken. The appearance of asheen must persist for at least 30 seconds before it may be scored as apositive result. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Particulate surface deposits also interfere with interpreting sheentest results, leading to false positive results. This interference occurswhen drilling fluid fines remain at the surface of the test water, normallyoccurring for the first 15-30 seconds, after which time they sink intothe test water. Some fines do not sink, however. Generally these can bedifferentiated from oil sheens because fines have a ``flat'' appearancewhereas oil sheens have a glossy or more reflective appearance. Also, oilsheens tend to ``disappear'' when the viewing angle is changed away fromthe angle of reflected light. Surface patches of particulate fines, onthe other hand, tend to appear as darkened patches, or shadow-like appearancesregardless of the viewing angle. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-23722 Filed 10-13-89; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-M </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>